Gauge: 18 sts and 26 rows = 4” in Stockinette Stitch.
still accepting me as his friend really makes me wonder.
TOP pie with whipped cream
Not only did they release this extremely informative book about their history to mark their 150th anniversary, but now they have an accompanying exhibit in the lobby of their building at 30 Lafayette, which includes documents, archival video, photographs and the like. (Brooklyn Before Now has yet to check out this exhibit, but very much looks forward to having something to do while waiting for invariably late friends at BAM's cinema).
It's a collection of recent interviews I did with children of actors from cinema’s Golden Age. They talk about the joys and difficulties of growing up in the shadow of the early Hollywood spotlight.
In 1968 a new $500,000 City Hall was proposed. The following year, it was suggested that an eleven-story City Hall could be built by 1975, with nine floors ready for immediate occupancy, and the rest to be finished later.
1 downing
I guess until an accurate answer can be ascertained and as long as they are going to keep sending me coupons for free undies I will continue to exercise, eat right and attempt to squeeze my average size derriere into those freebies!
2. The Alberto Gonzales Room, where you can’t remember anything.
7. Turn the oven down to 325° F (170° C). Bake for 40-45 minutes or until a skewer inserted in the center of the cakes comes out clean. You may check the cakes every ten minutes or so after the 30 minute mark to make sure it doesn’t over-bake. Let cool in the pan for 10 minutes, then invert onto a cooling rack to cool completely.
Moments of those shows stayed with me and just a particular line can make me laugh, even now. In one episode, Spanky fakes being sick because he doesn't want to go to school. He places a thermometer under hot water, sticks it in his mouth and calls for his Mom. She is amazed to discover his fever is well above that which would make him dead, yet keeps a straight face. Spanky, truly a member of the school of overacting, sighs that he's too sick to go to school. His Mom sighs too, then adds, "Okay. But there's no school today. It's Saturday."
Ahhh…the hat trick. So far, only Neil’s scored three times…twice! Which puts him only one hat trick away from tie-ing Darryl Sittler. What’s surprising about this accomplishment is that both books came out in the same decade.
God looses abundance in our lives so that we, in turn, can deliver it into the earth to help bring about His kingdom.
So what’s the problem and why are Paleo Works flagging this up?
So everyone will see me the way that I see them
The property is fortified by a wooden palisade and a rampart. Armed guards patrol its perimeter.
(2) Thank You Notes - You can use it for thank yous to your bridal party, for gifts, family, whatever.
These days I have more hobbies than I know what to do with. Baking is the latest obsession, but my all time passion aside from my family is quilting. I don't think anything will make me quite as happy as quilts do. I am having a good time ticking off the list of each new creative endeavor I find myself suddenly emmersed in however. But in the end they always lead me back to quilts. Like cakes...cupcakes even. I have been dreaming of cupcakes and what do you know? Somehow my two little hands produced not a cupcake...but a quilted cupcake...isn't that a peculiar thing? :)
The game was conceived by Warren Davis and Jeff Lee. Lee designed the titular character based on childhood influences and gave Q*bert a large nose that shoots projectiles. His original idea involved traversing a pyramid to shoot enemies, but Davis removed the shooting game mechanic to simplify gameplay. Q*bert was developed under the project name Cubes, but was briefly named Snots And Boogers and @!#?@! during development.
Finally, Hewitt himself would become mayor of New York City in 1886 during a heated election in which a candidate by the name of Theodore Roosevelt would place third.
Now that the sun has risen on May 2nd, what’s next? Nobody knows. Even CNN says May Day fizzled in an opinion piece by Amitai Etzioni. However can something really “fizzle” if nobody expected it to “sizzle” in the first place?
Weaving was also completely different between the two. Talyn is going to take some getting used to. A lot of getting used to. His shed is very small, for one thing. A regular boat shuttle is not going through there. Northwest included a quill shuttle with the order, and it’s much smaller than a boat shuttle is, height-wise.
Cathy
Now meanwhile, as the world continues to spin off its axis…
One final note: There is no truth to the rumor that Mr Cheeseball is on final warning. There are some people who are above reproach. This man has been with our company for 3 weeks, since his release from Folsom. He is a special and valued employee.
Hello my lovers!
To be fair, she was right.
I made it back to the plane with 5 mins to spare and breathing deep lungfuls of air collapsed into my seat, sweat running down my face like a waterfall. By the time that I had recovered and cooled down the pilot had finished his final checks and we were off into the morning sky for the short hop to Kuala Lumpur.
ProMarkers to color
Not surprising results, really. Rachel begged her readers to vote for her (although it was pretty darn good), and as for Bryan's, well, again, you people need help.
In any case, I’ve been doing this experiment for a couple of weeks now, and I haven’t noticed any deterioration in my health. I’m thinking about extending the philosophy to clothing.
Rhinos....how does a small boy cope with the world!
The Higher Regional Court of Munich (OLG München, case reference: 23 U 2198/11) agreed with the artist but refused to rule on the question of whether or not the fries were art (presumably if they were, they would be a sculpture). Instead the court awarded €2,000 on the basis of the chips' economic value. Key evidence appears to have been given by an art collector who said she had offered to pay €2,500 for them. However, as the artist had only asked for €2,000 in compensation, that was the amount the court awarded together with an order that the art gallery pay 90% of the artist's costs.
The finished book, my first one, made from 5 tissue rolls plus the front and back covers which are from a paper towel roll. I used cardstock and printed paper and a couple of paper embellies from CTMH, odds and ends of lace, ribbon, pearls, SU rub-ons and a couple of metal embellishments from my stash, the front and back have beautiful velvet paper.
How hard does this guy work? I am proud we have him to represent us and anyone who has met Nick will know what I mean. You couldn’t ask for a better person to be the leader of todays BNP.
Mark 11: 24-25 (NIV)
1 large egg, lightly beaten
Millions of fans of Hindi movies will soon be able to watch their favourite Bollywood films in multiplexes, with highly-placed sources in the film production and exhibition business saying a resolution is expected before June 12 to the two-month dispute over revenue-sharing between producers, distributors and multiplex owners.
Finding Water by Julia Cameron
The skirt is chocolate brown suede (of course, I have to have a piece of leather/suede in the May capsule!), and was last worn here.
1 Tbsp. ground flax seed
We are both astonished to find an iron in the budget range for less than the price of an average bottle of wine.
Via TDP (Texas Democratic Party):
‘And ending the game is impossible as long as the game itself is still on the board.’
Crime is another example. Crime has so many facets that it should be in a section on its own, but let’s examine some issues.
our boat was so big that we couldn't dock, so we had to hop on a smaller boat to actually get to land.
The bad news is... I've not heard back from Eden and he is likely to put out a restraining order on me (as I also sent him a second message with a link to my blog to prove I'm not a stalker and I'm just a regular human -as most stalkers do). Hey, the Universe gave me his name (twice) so I had to follow up.
I put Relda back in the chest. I was too old to carry the magic, but too lonely to want to pass up a friend who always talked to me. Relda became lifeless again. I put the lid back down on my hope chest.
They are $150 each, or $575 for the set of 4.
Can you guess what happens?
PCC: What do you mean? Something like, “Is my body supposed to be able to bend like that” or “At what point is it socially acceptable to punch my trainer in the jugular?”
They both has extensive surgery, and both surgeries went well.
now you listen to someone else
So let’s come together to talk about the kind of Jewish community that would be meaningful to each of us. We’ll talk about the kinds of ideas, events and programs which could exist: we’ll challenge the idea that there can only be one Jewish community, or one Jewish way of thinking, in Melbourne.
Just want to add a post to remind you about the special classes I teach. I am passionate about Cricut and support their products. I am also a beleiver in the Spotted Canary school, and teach the 4 week version of it. Please E mail me or leave a message for a complete listing of all my classes.
First up for me was the Gun Shop Fizz on the right, and Alex's Disappearing Ink (Dolin Blanc, Sherry, Strawberry Bitters, Rosewater, Lemon Peel, Mint) on the left. Cocktails are generally made with one or two dashes of bitters, but the fizz uses two ounces of Peychaud's. I expected a puckering challenge to my mouth, but the Gun Shop is bright and refreshing. More wonderful drinks followed, including Rhiannon Enlil's delicious Bees for Pele. (Rhum Agricole, Yellow Chartreuse, Lemon, Honey, Spice Bitters, Angostura Bitters) and a Sazerac made with Thomas H. Handy rye.
They were made from a mixture of donated blocks and will bring comfort and warmth to a needy person.
One thing I've been thinking about lately—and this is prompted by Justine Musk's post—are writers who aggressively promote. (Justine has a great blog, by the way, and she's very engaging. Can't wait to read more of her work.)
Recovering from a large abdominal incision right above my no-no area aside, I would go so far as to say I feel great. It's a very similar recovery process to having a C-Section, no heavy lifting, no repetitive bending and I have to wear this glamorous stretchy binder with a Velcro fastener across my midsection for the next 6 weeks. The binder is kind of like wearing noisy Spanx, but also kind of like wearing a bulky mini-skirt made from diapers, and the best part is that MDH gets to help me put it on after I bathe. What a treat for him, I'm sure.
Everything about the letter brought me to tears. In all fairness, everything has been bringing me to tears since I’ve received the affidavit: pictures of my son; a message of encouragement from a Facebook friend; conversations with potential lawyers; my magnificent coffee cup. Le Clown is a clever writer, but he’s also easily stirred. Some say his sensitivity is a wonderful quality; Le Clown wishes he could write without crying.
And the deer! He's so cute!
I got a note:
No Frills had Boneless Skinless Chicken Breasts (frozen) on special for a mere $2/lb ... one package of three huge breasts was less than $5! How could I resist?
Good lord do people fucking love this Jeremy Lin character. And for whatever reason, they love him in the most twee way possible. It’s like a non-stop contest to see who can come up with the best play on words using his last name.
Look how beautiful they are!
Blue river runnin’ slow and lazy
Angina usually is caused by increased oxygen demand when the heart is working harder than usual, for example, during exercise, or during mental or physical stress. According to researchers at Harvard University, physical stress is harder on the heart than mental stress.
It’s time for you as a believer to begin to act that way. You have obtained an inheritance, and in that inheritance you have been given all authority. The God of the universe lives inside you! He lives and walks in you. Become God-inside-minded and you will begin to walk in this point of authority.
P.S one more thing. I have this thing of always smile at old people, just so they dont think i’m some teenage thug and will try too rob them or something……Does anyone else do that??
Boycott California (or some other beer). Two Votes.
A new friend, Abby from Arizona, an intelligent lawyer with a delicious wit, first brought Ron’s Bilerico piece to my attention through a tweet she made to the site.
The rain started to come down on us again and Ingrid had a couple of ideas of places to go to eat. We got on a bus which, whilst being considerably slower than the subway, allows you to take into some of the city. We ended up at Serendipity, famous for frozen hot chocolates; an idea at first I struggled to understand but after trying one, made significantly more sense. We stopped for a while, enjoyed a burger before heading back out into the miserable weather.
hit the floor (whom to blame the cats or the boys?)
Black and white jersey dress - Basque by Myer
As a Black girl from the South, my hair is as much a part of my identity as my name. I am intimately familiar with pressing combs, wash-and-curls, wrap-and-tap, and creamy crack. However, having grown up going to “White schools”, and now working in corporate America, I’ve braved the curious glances and spent my fair share of explaining the differences. I’ve also moved enough times to know the struggle of trying to find someone who even knows what to do with my hair, let alone my skin, nails, or can figure out why my booty won’t get smaller despite cardio three days a week. The point is, I’ve been there. I get it. So, my hope is that you’ll come and share your story with me.
You could also say that the narrative has been exceedingly successful in that regard. What sane person, for instance, could hear “warmest ever,” “hottest ever,” dozens and dozens of times, from the twin pulpits of science and journalism, and not conclude that one’s own time on Earth was particularly unfortunate, grim, doomed?
Wonderland:
I’m still continuing to make dinners without soy, which, I’m sure I’ve said before, makes my grocery bill higher. It’s been nearly 2 months that I’ve been off soy and I haven’t had even the slightest twinge of my usual stomach pain and I’ve even found that I wake up in the morning without that queasy feeling I so often had. There are still the occasional things that I’ll make for the boys or for Darling Hubby that contain soy, but I just avoid them. I mostly do this since we still have the things in the pantry or the freezer and I want to use them up.
And to add insult to injury...or in this case, injury to insult....when I reached up to cut the tie wraps, the lantern fell with such force, that the metal pull cord flew up and clocked me in the eye! Try explaining that black eye at PTA! "Well see, I made this beast of a light fixture out of coffee filters and hot glue...."
Woke up this morning well before sunrise and sluggishly started a pot of Mello Joy dark roast coffee. Using one rounded tablespoon of grounds for each cup of water I was brewing what we call in South Louisiana café noir.
Two of their brands are due to be arriving soon, long before the airport's brewpub is set to open. In the coming days or weeks look for Gordon Biersch's Marzen and one of their rotating seasonal beers.
Along with the sewing I also added some fabric too. I really just added more to my stash of fabrics I already have. More Flea Market Fancy, Dear Stella Anchors Away and Going Coastal. No pictures to share of the new additions because they've already been cut or mixed in with the existing piles, but trust me they are gorgeous!
“Say it’s unfortunate, say that this is something that should not have been done. … But to apologize for something that was not an intentional act is something that the president of the United States, in my opinion, should not have done,” Santorum said, adding that apologizing “lends credibility that somehow or another that it was more than (an accident).”
A story in the history of this popular British carol caught my eye. The carol was first published by an Irish bishop in 1684. Vaughn Williams apparently heard it sung in Sussex, England, and wrote down the text and tune. The tune we generally hear today is the Vaughn Williams tune of 1919.
Mr. Bowen drove slowly on the way home, taking his time around the curves. When he pulled into the Miller’s graveled driveway, he turned to Kathy in the backseat. “What’s your driver situation for tomorrow?”
There are more fabulous inspirational creations on the La-La Land Crafts Blog both today and on Friday and don't forget that you can link up your La-La Land Crafts makes to the Customer Gallery to be in with a chance to win a prize
As you can see, there is much to choose from and my list is not attempting to be comprehensive. Now, go and investigate the lager world. You may be surprised.
Now, I'm considering a new phone. My phone is very outdated and is a flip-phone.
Just because we do indeed have a lot of holes in our knowledge, there is no need to assume something to which there exists no evidence for, so there is no need to assume that there could be a god, just like there is no need to assume that the Zsadlfkjasdiagrb exists.
As in many of his movies, Clint represents America - and in this case although his character has no time for his immigrant neighbours, he is also their salvation. He shows Thao that by applying himself and adopting the American Way, he can become a man and is able to build a future for himself and for his community.
My routines have definitely changed. For one, I eat breakfast EVERYDAY unless there is medical reasoning such as a procedure or test that I am undergoing...and then I just arrange IF I CAN to have three meals a little delayed~as the body, MINE INCLUDED, is jump started with a routine of nutrition and available sources of energy~yeah, this is WHAT FOOD IS anyway~ENERGY! Nothing more, and nothing less. To chase this for a second, I've changed my thinking to remind myself a good deal that FOOD IS NOT my friend, comfort, play pal, fun or event...it's simply FUEL...and who parties down at the GAS STATION? Uh....way too many who I've now left behind...and hence my life is changing! Breakfast is very important to me, and I get really hungry and KNOW I need it by the way I feel physically before the appointed usual time.
9. Doesn't Make It Alright
Shouldn’t that be a bastion best left to people who actually have a male child or those with no real experience of raising a male child be experts in pointing to the way a male child must be raised(since she believes that she is an expert after receiving a bad relationship from her male relatives) ?
Legg has also ordered the Maryland State Police to re-process Woollard's 2009 permit renewal application without considering the "good and substantial reason" requirement."
Studies show that flowers actually have a positive effect on human beings!
Guys - you are doing your campaign - and real ale - a grave disservice. I know you'll never agree with me, but can you not at least see that in making this post, I'm not attacking real ale?
" Nathaniel Lin is currently the President, Analytics123.com. Before this he was the VP of Retail Analytics with EYC and the President, Aspen Marketing Analytics (now part of Epsilon). He is also the Founder of the exclusive Analytics Executives Network on LinkedIn. He brings a rich and unique mix of marketing and strategic experience through his over 20 years in senior leadership roles (for example, as the lead for IBM Analytics Center of Excellence, Director of Analytics at OgilvyOne, VP of Customer Analysis at Fidelity Investments) for both Fortune 100 clients and major agencies. He was on the executive team for the founding of the IBM Analytics Center of Excellence.
Howdy there! What's new, cabbages? It has been a few days since I've sat down at the computer. Much has occurred over the past little bit of time.
I have a cute little Easter Welcome sign above the Front Door......
Furthermore, I believe Huber & Stevens’ hypothesis opens welfare state theory to topics in New Institutional Economics: if political parties are the penultimate source of different schemes of welfare development or retrenchment, what are the institutional norms and patterned behaviors that bring about their different policies?
I wanted to use some distressed corrugated cardboard as my card base. It gives a great support and has a masculine texture. I inked the edges with Clearsnap ink in Chocolate and Blueberries
Arrested, he was bound.
So thats my first round up of the pubs in Tenby, next trip (June) I'll try to visit the ones I passed by this time, and I know there are a couple more I've not mentioned.
Contrast
scalloped Nestie oval
4. They are fresh enough to poach. In case you weren’t aware – fresh eggs are a necessity for poaching eggs correctly. Delia Smith would agree with me. That’s right, I follow a British lady because she’s awesome, and she likes eggs. Also, she’s got some pretty great advice on how to cook things. When I read her posts, it’s like a flash back to the 1950′s, and I feel like I’m living in an alternate universe while I make things the way she suggests. (They also tend to work 99% of the time, even if they don’t use crazy appliances or are slightly old fashioned.)
softened with time
Marked by reservations
Our meal changed so many times that it ended up spaghetti (loose term) bolognese. I’d forgotten my blow torch and ramekins so no creme brulee either.
This online application has a number of interesting effects. Of course, safety and security of your personal information is tantamount. Google treats user information here the same as with any other of the services it provides which collect information. It takes care to ensure the safety and integrity of personal information.
So first up, here are some swatches of Muchi, Muchi by herself. It's a lovely soft baby pink creme. Not usually my polish of choice, but this is actually a nice colour. Especially for 'colour cleansing' for me because I am a purple/green/blue hoor.
Anyhow, I've been making all sorts of sandwiches and recently, its rekindled my love for the roasted bell pepper. sweet, tangy, and oh so delicious it is such a versitile addition to anything! I had one left over in the fridge from making sandwiches... but hm, an entire roasted pepper on a piece of fish? hmm... how about I food processor that up and dump it over some broiled salmon. Voila!
There is almost no limit to what a human being can do as long as he doesn’t have this variety of stuff thrown at him in the guise of Affinity, Communication and Reality. People are postulating new realities for him. And every time he accepts one of these new realities, he’s sort of sunk.
“I know you love him. He was your first love and it will always be difficult to forget him. This is the reason I won’t force you with anything. As I always say, before anything and everything, we are friends. As a friend, I would advise you not to go back to him. He does not deserve you and I’m afraid he will hurt you again.”
Donna Karan Gold
A really great trick is to lie them out on a piece of white bristol board,
There are also various budgets, deluxe and luxury hotels that are worth a try. Economy hotels too can be opted for. These hotels offer a serine atmosphere with excellent services by the staff. The Banani Resort, Chital Tourist Lodge In Sundarban, Hotel Krishna Kunj, and Hotel Apanjan are some of the other accommodation options out of the many in Sundarbans. Find peace and relaxation amidst nature in the Sundarbans.
Laid up while he mended, he dwelt on the girl he'd lost. The separation did little to stem his passion; indeed, it made him yearn for her all the more. He felt guilty about her loss of honor, for he knew, of course, that now she would never make the important marriage her family had hoped for in sending her to Court. The only justification for his behavior had to be the depth of his passion. Somehow he had to demonstrate it. Strictly forbidden any access to her, once more the play would be "the thing." He would rewrite his old poem, the one he wrote when he was in love with Mary Browne. He had the stage now at Blackfriar's. Surely someone would inform her of it, and she would come to see it. The Court was off limits to her, but Blackfriar's was a private theater, and anyone was welcome who could pay. Adept at reading the language of love through symbols and metaphors, as were all his community, she would see it and understand that he still loved her. On the night she came, would he dare ask the actor that played Romeo to turn and direct towards her his speech about the Queen, the one that goes:
I’ve gone to community board meetings where we had support from more than nine hundred people from three community boards.
The Tony Kornheiser Show: Sports and pop culture from Washington, DC.
On Saturday I gathered all of the boys stuffs that they refused to touch anymore (bouncer, jumperoo, baby carriers..stuffs like that) and I started writing an ad so I can sell them. I despise clutters. If I see something that kinda sit in one space for a period of time (with the exception of stuffs that sit in my closet HAHA) I started to get paranoid about it and want that block of space back. I'm weird like that. By Sunday afternoon, I sold most of the stuffs I want to sell. It's really funny to see the boys just kinda stared at those items while being taken away by strangers. To be honest, I lost a lot of money this way. I always buy brand new but my boys don't always like what I bought. Or if they do, it took only few months before they get over it. That's when that thing will sit there and it annoys the hell out of me that I have to sell it. And you know what, I couldn't even recoup half of what I spent sometimes despite it looks like new. Babies/kids items just don't hold much values (like mommy's Chanel)..but hey it's better than just sitting there.
Roasted Brussels Sprouts flavored with olive oil, salt, pepper and Parmesan cheese. Simple and very delicious.
Then she said, "Disown me and never talk to me again.
I salute the United Democratic Front, the National Education Crisis Committee, the South African Youth Congress, the Transvaal and Natal Indian Congresses, and COSATU, and the many other formations of the mass democratic movement.
Oh, and as a side note...breasts for breastfeeding are so poorly engineered. I can tell they were made by a man. There is absolutely no reason for both faucets to turn on when you latch onto one. What a bad design!
As for Crimson, which is not pictured, Kim had this to say:
Combat Rock was a last straw for me; at first. To me, it was no different than a Seals and Crofts or Elton John record circa 1977- The Clash had become exactly what they set out to replace, in a terrifyingly short time. You had your radio-ready funky songs and a couple watered-down rock songs, but the preponderance was soft rock mush (Strummer’s opinion of his songwriting partner's material is nakedly apparent in the unenthusiastic performances on many of the album’s many filler tracks).
i don't know how to make that "do i look notty?" or "sebenarnya i nak kata i cute tapi i letak caption "omg buruknya i!! #sadface" so that people would tell me what i already know - i am cute" looks.
cream as a dip with other fruit.
Around the first part of December, Vanessa and Owen got to write a letter to Santa Claus. Vanessa was so excited to be able to write the letter all by herself and tell Santa that she wants a Disney Princess Dress Up Book. She did such a good job! Owen liked to scribble and draw on his letter so Vanessa and I got to help him write what he wants which is a Dinosaur book and Land Before Time DVD.
~A neutral color palette with strong black accents and subtle pops of color
After hearing these words in my head the should disappeared and the want or desire to make it myself took over. It was an incredible feeling, I finally understood what so many artists have experienced, that absolute need to create.
I like to read to you the story from Christian Post concerning the recent shooting that took place in a Colorado Church and mission training complex. I’m going to just read it as it is without comment and allow you to think about it while I read.
After two botched jobs (don't even ask about our hardwood floor debacle), I am beginning to wonder if anyone out there takes pride in their work and does a good job anymore. I am beginning to think that the entitled and lazy are going to take over the world. I am beginning to think that I am not going to be able to look at the patio without spiking my blood pressure and becoming homicidal. Maybe I am a pessimist after all.
- pasta, etc. etc. etc.
- I drank dirty monkeys on a white sand beach while watching the clear blue sea roll in & out. (and yes, I thought "this is the life" every second of it.)
Well ... off to the coal mines errr i mean lab. Can't wait to tell you more about my job! Here's a sneak peek ... I've already embarrased myself! Yesterday I dropped a pen on the ground and instead of walking over to it to get it, I reached super far forward in my rolling office chair (have you figured out where this is going?) and it slipped out from under me, and down I went! The guys came rushing over to me, but the only thing hurt was my pride. Then I had to wipe to coal off of my pants. Oh the horror, lol!
Last night I met up with some friends and we hit some bars.
The idea for this dessert came from my good friend Elana, who every year makes up a big batch of stewed peaches and spices, with a swirl of coconut milk and a couple shots of rum. Oh yes. We eat our bowls of sultry sweetness giggling through mouthfuls of total indulgence, and always going back for seconds (and often thirds). She calls this dish “sexy peaches” because they really are that good. Even though my version skips the alcohol, it still delivers uncompromising flavour and unadulterated pleasure. Oh my.
monetary range. Once a transfer payment is made (in the United States, a payment made to individuals by the federal government through various social benefit programs; e.g., social security, financial aid, etc.), the tax code categorizes it as to whether it is a tax exemption or tax credit, lowering
If the chief captain had respect for this Paul, that respect increased manifold. Paul’s position as a Roman citizen was better and more secure than his own. Even though it is not written in our text, I feel sure that the soldier envied Paul. Would that he had such a standing. He knew Rome by choice and by education. Paul, rather was known by Rome as one of it’s own, being born into the Empire.
Let go of whatever makes you stop! Strip it off. Now!
Vibration and Frequency and Form
So I have.
Both PCS members and UNITE members (in health) have returned 90% votes to reject the Government's "final offer" on pensions which, in all the unfunded schemes, simply amounted to a repackaging of the proposals made and rejected on 2 November. Key to the position of both unions has been the confidence of the lay leadership, supported by their officials, to offer members an honest assessment and a clear recommendation.
On-demand is simple and for the majority of news sites is good. It’s the internet, it is 2012, and for the most part everyone has access to the web and can find what they need when they need it. If you’re a news site that can’t be on-demand then you are probably already bankrupt and no longer a news organization. Although if you did want to look at it a different way, some sites are still difficult to get for apps for phones or tablets and other devices, which is really where the on-demand market is now.
Instead of trying to fit a round peg in a square hole, take a path of least resistance. Keep it simple and recommend a basic entity redemption or cross purchase agreement with term life insurance.
This year I am making more of a conscious effort to have quality moments with my boys. B.M.W.B (becoming the mama I want to be) is my way of recording and hopefully inspiring other mama’s too. Please inspire me with the little moments you are snatching with your little people OR with ideas I could do with mine. If you have blogged about it please leave a comment so we can all visit and encourage each other.
Thank you Sara for these precious moments back in the art room. I never would have gone there without you.
Tainan City, Taiwan
Empowering Youth Through Travel is a Chicago based 501(c)3 organization dedicated to empowering inner-city youth through hands-on learning of current issues and developing them as global leaders equipped with the skills to enact positive change at home and abroad. Participants chosen for the program attend a six-month, Saturday program in Chicago where they learn in depth about EYTT’s global theme, sustainability, through in-class research, field trips, and volunteer opportunities. Self-discovery and individual growth continues overseas in Uvita, Costa Rica as students explore the country hands-on by studying sustainable development and volunteering on a local conservation project within the Uvita community.
**IMPORTANT BLOOGER NOTICE THINGAMIJIG** I am an awful excuse for a blogger who actually had EVERYTHING for this weekend written out and failed to post anything....so your "two-fer Tuesday" is for this week a "three-fer Tuesday of WHOOPS!" Fresh of the much battered Unmuffled Keypad for you this Tuesday we have "The Week In Review", "Rants and Raves - Medical Edition" and "That BLOODY Word!" Enjoy!
But everyone was ok. Thank goodness! But still not something you want to have to be dealing with via the phone and the boys home alone.
Unknown in any former period;
But generally, if you’re any good, and are open to learning, to criticism, and a lot of hard work, the frequency of rejection will fall.
These folds aren’t going anywhere and we didn’t have to use a needle and thread anywhere!
Unless we are constantly aware of the danger, the tyranny of public opinion may well become the bane of free speech and thereby of the very concept of freedom.
She suddenly leaped out of the chair and began to pace.
This is the point the post author is making. The reality is that if you head off into the woods to “bug out” you are more likely to become a casualty or a refugee than to turn into the ultimate survivor.
Nearer the sky.
There is a new interview with actress Irene Jacob and she talks about her experiences working with Kieslowski on Red. She also discusses her first meeting with him and how that led to her being cast in The Double Life of Veronique (1991). Jacob talks about working with her Red co-star Jean-Louis Trintignant and comes across as a smart and engaging person.
IP TRANSLATOR consequences - part 2
What else? Mum is here for another week and then she's off - her trip has gone by so quickly! I keep thinking we should have done some exciting things while she was here, but it has been pretty nice just hanging out at home.
1 – A convicted sex-offender goes to prison. While there he undergoes therapy and is helped to improve his education. The prison is a reasonably comfortable hostel type environment, where inmates develop a supportive community – by turns cooking, cleaning, and doing DIY, and being encouraged to teach and look after each other. He can see his family in the contact centre up to three times a week, and is encouraged to keep phoning and writing to his partner and other important people in his life. He is released back to his family, who all know what he has done and can both care for him and be vigilant for future warning signs. He is allowed to work in any reasonable job (i.e. not a teacher etc.), without declaring his conviction, as long as his probation worker has approved the post.
It is just to feel your hand in mine
Your thoroughbred interpreted elasticity to involve trying to kick himself in the head with his back feet during the working canter.
At least tomorrow's Saturday.
Ink- copics, black
HOW DO I PLAN TO MAKE AN IMPACT: More than anything else I’ve seen, I’ve been infuriated and motivated by the isolation of individual organizations in the international development industry. Day in and day out we compete for grants only to accomplish the same goal: end poverty. If we all want the same thing, I believe there has to be a more efficient way to operate collectively, mobilizing individual strengths and leveraging our great networks to create more monumental and sustainable change in marginalized communities. I don’t know what the answer is, yet, but I think it’s 40% innovation, 40% collaboration, and 20% rigor. We need to think creatively but act effectively, and we can only do that if we put our minds – and moneys – together. Recently, I took a tiny step in that direction. I founded The Righters (www.the-righters.com) as an online forum for the voices of workers at the front lines of social movements. At just the beginning of a very big thing, right now The Righters is a place to swap stories and inspiration, and hopefully soon it will be a place to connect and learn as well. That’s what I hope to be remembered by – as a catalyst for collaboration in this industry so that we can finally keep all the mothers alive to care for all the babies!
The story starts out showing a fight at the playground between two boys, Zachary and Ethan. Zachary hits Ethan with a stick and knocks out two of his teeth. Their parents decide to get together and resolve the problem between the boys. Ethan’s parents, Penelope (Jodie Foster) and Michael Longstreet (John C. Reilly) invite Zachary’s parents, Nancy (Kate Winslet) and Alan Cowan (Christoph Waltz) to their apartment to discuss what happened between their sons and the possible ways to mend their hostility towards each other. Everything goes smoothly at first, but cracks slowly begin to appear, with disagreement arising between the two parties and between each couple as well. The conversation begins to have no connection with what to do about the boys, but the many problems that each individual has towards their partners, their conflicting points of view, and their roles in society.
"No more than ten seconds! Until I stuck my hand in". She says.
THIS STORY WILL BE UPDATED
Sometimes I wonder if I should be writing the backstory instead of the present concept, because the backstory is well planned and complete. Meanwhile, the story I'm trying to write is about as clear as Minnesota Blizzard. I can see some blurry shapes in the distance and I can only hope I'm heading in the right direction.
Each month I'll pick a different card and take a look at the player featured and the insert or insert sets importance at the time of issue. Most of the cards I'll feature have little value and many are cards I would still rather not have in my collection. For many, they are examples of the excess and one upmanship between the card companies that dominated the hobby, but I thought this would be a fun exercise to look back at cards that have been overlooked or forgotten in the last decade or two.
I hope your weekend brings you lots of love, laughter & a little relaxation.
Passing this query up would mean certain death for your Publishing corporation.
Thank you Sara! These shoes are great!
"No," I held my hands up. "You know I can't. I'll have a beer or two, but that seriously has to be it."
‘It’s difficult. Something about tax’. Big Boss leaves it there and two minutes later my Boss receives a phonecall. Thirty minutes later we have all our payslips.
Welcome to May 2012! Let me help orient you to several key highlights of this super-spectacular month:
And then, the Armageddon Blues, by Daniel Keys Moran. 1988. It’s an “extraordinary mission through time to prevent the end of the world.” Fuck yeah, time travel, that’s what I’m talking about. I get the feeling that as soon as the topic of time travel comes up, the instant response is “oh my god, really? Not another one…” That’s mostly because I kind of feel that way with time travel. It’s so easy to fuck up if you haven’t got it all meticulously plotted out. There are repercussions many of us have never thought of. Having said that, I’ve read, am reading, and am writing within the time travel sub-genre, and loving it when it comes together right. I guess when you pull it off, there’s a sense of pulp elitism in the sci-fi circles, like “yeah, I’ve written time travel, what of it?” And then there’s that thing where tons of shows have done that exact same thing on tv. It’s been done poorly so many times, and it’s been done brilliantly enough times to convince writers that they’ll be able to write it brilliantly too, and add their own spin to it. I’m one of those people, and I absolutely hate when it doesn’t come together. Nevertheless, the title and description of this book were enough to get me excited. It’s positively brimming with ’80s pulp magic.
My brain is still trying to rationalise that one aspect alone, LOL.
My husband is gone for a month and I feel like part of my brain is gone. I feel like part of my soul is gone. I feel like part of who I am is just gone.
Made his first recording in 1942 and formed his own band in 1945.
441210 Recreational vehicle dealers (including motor home & travel trailer dealers)
The rule for this award is that it can only be passed to one person, and it should be someone who does great work but has struggled in some manner recently. Also, the recipient must say something nice about their own writing. So, to fulfill that request, I will say that despite my imperfections, I feel that writing comes very naturally to me. I never feel that I struggle with it or lack ideas. Now if only I could become much better at it! I'm passing this along to Roland Yeomans.
Most of my life, in fact perhaps clear up until a few months ago, I didn't understand my mother and we had difficulty between us. When I came to take care of her back in January, that changed.
It’s been 70 years since Sameshima attended USC, and he has longed for this day. But his wife and daughter didn’t live long enough to see it.
When I look at nature, or walk down a street in an old town...everything makes itself noticed to me...from a decaying leaf, a white moth on a metal wall, the expression on a person's face, to the colors in the air and all around me. I love the process of layering, of adding glazes of color and taking away.
Recommended for Fans Of...: Stories about being new in school, or even new in town, which there seem to be plenty of right now in graphic novel format, happily: Friends With Boys by Faith Erin Hicks is a good one (reviewed here), as is Americus by MK Reed (reviewed here) and any of Hope Larson's books. Also, stories with artist characters like The Plain Janes by Cecil Castellucci (reviewed here).
Dr. Ahmad Al-Tayeb: Yes, absolutely. I have identified a plan or movement not toward Shiite-Sunni rapprochement, but toward the Shiitization of Sunni youth. Just as I would not accept a campaign in Tehran of Najaf to make Shiite youth convert to the Sunni doctrine, I will never agree to a similar Shiite campaign in any Sunni country.
It's time to crank out a Bloomin' Tuesday post. For those of you who are new to my blog, this is a post I publish weekly throughout the late spring, summer and early autumn months when my garden is beginning to bloom and in full swing. Here's an example of such a post last July. In the next few weeks I'll be posting periodically as my garden is just barely coming to life. Colorado is a late bloomer compared to most other states. Dandelions have been the rock star in my garden for a week or two now. I was so anxious to see yellow "flowers" that I felt like watering and fertilizing them when they first made their appearance. I held off however, and now I'm glad I did. Now there are other, more appropriate, buds starting to shine!
The Queen rules over Ludania with an iron fist, forcing its inhabitants to make a pledge to protect her over all others. This entails turning in anyone speaking against the Queen or contributing in any way to the Resistance. She has also implemented a unique way to separate the classes and ensure that upward mobility is impossible: limit each class by the languages they are allowed to speak. Charlie is a Vendor class girl who has always had the ability to understand all the languages and knows the importance of hiding it. If anyone ever found out and turned her in, she would swiftly be put to death, as is the punishment for any infraction no matter how small. When a mysterious boy takes interest in her after he notices her strange ability, she is drawn into a political struggle between the aging Queen looking for an heir and the young revolutionaries fighting for equality. What is Charlie's place in all this? Can she make a difference in this power struggle?
Unlike hybrids, which excel in the city, the Jetta TDI is at its best on the highway. Here, it’s punchy, quiet–no traditional diesel “rattle” here–and very fuel-efficient indeed.
This requires using the Win32 SDK with P/Invoke, specifically:
yet i think i know what i need
Oh and I have to say, Capital One customer service was wonderful during the whole process. At one point when I was having trouble booking our tickets through oneworld’s online booking tool, the Capital One account manager called American Airlines’ oneworld desk and stayed on the line with me while we tried to get to the bottom of why the transaction wasn’t going through. Amazing!
How do you stay healthy at parties?
Whether or not you know someone who has been affected by sexual assault, it is important that we all employ self-reflection about how our behaviors contribute either to a culture that promotes sexual assault, or a culture that prevents it.
Let us go and make our visit.
I don't follow too many blogs these days but these are two I truly enjoy. I make time for real people that have real stories. I hate the sugar coated my life is a storybook blogs and will pass them by to read real stories of real moms getting it done in a heart beat.
2) working on Saturdays: my boss required me to work on Saturdays and did not pay me for them (which I found out later, she should have). She convinced me that this was a good idea so that I could “catch up” on the industry knowledge I didn’t have as the newest employee.
Not so long ago I was in a conversation with someone who insisted I was wrong about something. I knew what I was saying was true, because I experienced what I was sharing. But the person I was talking to went to great lengths to try to prove me wrong. This person even contacted someone else to try to get an answer to show me I was wrong. He/she just couldn't drop it. So I did.
Today I feel like absolute ass. All 3 kids have strep throat and I am afraid I do too. My throat is killing me and I have been sneezing and shivering all day. I am trying to stick it out at work and hopefully will feel a bit better tomorrow. I was able to get in some weights and 6 miles at lunch but really should have taken a nap instead. Have an awesome week and live it while you can.
With small volumes the microbreweries can pay special attention to the raw materials going into their brews. The picture is from the Raasted Brewery stand at the Københavnske Øldage 2006. The brewery is an impressive little business run by a 24 year-old law student, already with a professional web site, yet with parents giving a helping hand at the stand. I tasted their Trippel Special Edition, made with "Westmalle yeast"- a beer that would make any Belgian brewer proud.
I only had one option to choose from at the cafe. All the sweet crepe fillings were non-vegan (either with Nutella or honey or butter). Besides the Vegan Monster savory crepe, all the other ones had meat/cheese/eggs in them. Naturally, I ordered the Vegan Monster. The filling was made from seitan, roasted red peppers, caramelized onions, and spinach. The seitan was light, with a fairly good flavor. I often steer clear of seitan because the texture irks me; however, this particular seitan was surprisingly good. Overall, the inside of the crepe was delicious, even though the onions could have been caramelized a bit more, but I just couldn’t get past that crepe shell.
Al joins Tenay and Taz at the commentary booth, we can vote on Twitter if Alex should get a TNA contract, but Robbie beats him with an implant DDT.
“I don’t trust the Downtown Brooklyn Partnership, I don’t Joe Chan, I don’t trust Forest City Ratner,” she said. “I certainly don’t trust ESDC, but I hope they do the right thing in this case.”
Today news was out that the UK high court has decided that TPB is "massively infringing on copyright". The facts that no copyright is being infringed upon here at the site was not a welcome fact, so that w...as ignored apparantly.
I think it is fairly well known that I do not like JMPD. After this December, I dislike them to the extent that I refuse to acknowledge their legal ability to enforce the traffic laws. No one seems to get why. Well, lets take a canter through some of the achievements of JMPD, their big boss Sbu Ndebele and the SA traffic system as a whole.
Most of us have one or two lying around in a drawer, be they metal or enamelled ... BUT if not then don't panic!
My touch never to warm a heart again
My sister, who is on her self-imposed diet, veered away from bread and complex carbohydrates. That’s why she only ordered potato salad. Knowing this, I began to scrutinize her dieting methods with my equally anti-dieting principles. Potatoes, as far as I know, are rich in carbohydrates. Potatoes plus mayonnaise make up a deadly combo, might as well get French Fries. But when her order was delivered, I have easily mistaken the potato salad for the mayo dip bowl.
A two-headed albino snake is the star attraction drawing the crowds to one of everyone's favourite events of the year - the exhibition of natural world oddballs in Switzerland.
Top Green Wine Tips;
Thanks to readings taken over the ferrari enzo owners club. A masterpiece from the ferrari enzo owners club of the open-topped Spyder version and we're pretty sure you'll be in for a car everyone could enjoy, and its phenomenal poise at every level means even those used to - some of its bulk. Turn the ferrari enzo owners club and the ferrari enzo crashed to corner with staggering speed. The suspension comprises of double wishbones up front and a driving position complicated by having the ferrari enzo owners club and clutch pedals offset well to the mini ferrari enzo a car meant for driving fast, not driving to work.
“Thank you.”
I had my first coca tea here in Lima and passed on the coca beer which I briefly glanced at while passing through the open market. I think this was only a novelty item. The coca tea is said to help with the high altitude and since I wasn’t taking the high altitude medicine, I decided to drink this throughout the day. I enjoyed the taste and it definitely gave me a boost of energy comparable to drinking a cup of coffee.
Just another day in the life of little Shawn Gorman trying to impress the world.
Be sure to check out the creations by the RI Rock Stars below to get more inspirations too!!
Keep Prepping Everyone!!!
Here we are, a Russian aircraft carrier on maneuver with the Greeks, which brings it directly into the Greek-Cyprus-Israel alliance. Its a clear message to Turkey and its pro-Islamic big NATO members, specifically, the US/UK pro-Jihadist Masons.
These reports on us are designed to give the government reasons to ban us. This is the plan by the left-wing media, to get us banned.
2010.08.14 Egypt Shimi 0 11 Eleven Christians are injured in assaults by Muslims stirred to anger by a local cleric.
It was almost dark when we arrived at the church. The church is not well lit and only the remaining sunlight is our source of light inside. We finished the prayer in less than 5 minutes and commute to Pagsanjan, Laguna.
On Sunday while my husband was mourning the loss of a football legend, I mourned in my own special way by going shopping.
and good handstands.
I recently noticed that LinkedIn rolled out a ‘Jobs You May Like’ product, which is pretty nifty. I looked through a few suggestions and they seemed pertinent from an industry point of view. For example, if you work as a software engineer in the gaming industry, suggested jobs will most likely be other software engineer jobs in the gaming industry). The algorithm seems smart enough to also suggest jobs in industries that are closely related to your current field. However, a simple but crucial variable they seem to have missed is seniority of the positions being suggested. Even though I have been in my current field for ~3 years, a lot of the jobs being suggested required much more experience (in some cases upwards of 10 years). Including this in the algorithm would significantly increase the relevance of jobs being suggested.
For a long time I would rarely smile…
*** UPDATE, September 3rd, 2011: I have added the images. ***
Heading for my pollen guide – or an online resource. http://www.bristolbeekeepers.org.uk/ shows dandelion might be the most likely source and as we drove away I saw quite a few dandelions. perhaps the frequent downpours had stopped grass mowing leaving more dandelions on view? The dandelions seemed fully open (and it was about 4 pm).
Pulling you away, far and deep
Ah so, the hidden love is because even tho we love them, we are afraid to rebuke them. When we look at it that way, it goes with other Proverbs we’ve read about raising children.
Not exactly true. I’ve tried to turn my head away from some quirks that bothered me about men I’ve dated in the past. Namely ones who live in disgusting hellholes they never can clean or pick-up. A couple of guys who believed in toking it up on Friday and Saturday nights was more exciting than a nice dinner and movie somewhere. And, one guy said his favorite past time was sleeping…I gave him a chance…ok maybe just one chance, but that says a lot.
Happy training!
History, however, presents the naked facts. And the naked facts are often extremely unpleasant. Don't get me wrong, I don't have a problem with telling children about the nasty things which have been done in the world: but I do have a problem with nastiness which is presented as entertainment.
We also enjoyed gluten free carrot cupcakes. I haven't made carrot cake since we moved down here - damn, this stuff is seriously out-of-this-world amazingly good. Whew!
I genuinely don’t wish to be antagonizing or harsh. Admittedly, this segment is harder to read objectively than others would be, due to its claims of how the world was created. So, although I have many criticisms and questions, please don’t take this as me being angry and against everything in the Good Book. Presumably after we get through this section I will have more to comment on than just the negatives and unknowns.
Tonight I had a friend coming over who is always willing to try my attempts at new recipes, so I threw together what I hoped would be a decent dessert.
If you are going to be in a location for more than a day, it might be a great idea to do a little research before you go.
WalkenTalken sets out arguments about stocks exactly like I’d want them presented. Too few videos make use of retiring celebrity voices to make a case for going long/short on equities. I’m just glad to be one of the first to witness the paradigm shift, as the qualities that made his performance in The Deer Hunter an Oscar-winner are brought to bear in finance, and made available for all via StockTwits.
Some critics accused the Russians of cutting corners by using an old Atari game console to navigate the craft, while other critics say the new film in the Mission Impossible franchise, Ghost Protocol, is the best of the four.
Mix the salmon with the lemon juice, shallots, capers and chives.
3 T mead
DUNDEE PORTER/DUNDEE WHEAT
It ended up earning just under $3 million overall. How much did it cost to make? Who knows; in the mid-Eighties, Michael Mann proved that anyone could make a movie like this; all they needed were neon lights, dark streets, fast cars and a young punk or two to headline. No Man's Land just proved that it doesn't matter if you have all of that, if you can't even be bothered to tell the actors apart.
Until now, I can’t move on to what just had happened 4 hours ago. I even brought my favorite book that she wrote (Table for Two). Without any hesitation, I asked her to sign the book and she did it! AAAH! I’m such a fan girl. You can’t blame me for it. I admire her so much. And now, she serves as my inspiration.
More fragile than mine
But BH is an amazing father, and if there's anyone who I'd want in this kid's corner right now, it's him. We're going to get through this as a family, and with any luck, F will come to know just how loved and supported he really is.
But how can that be
These three very Letters UFO is *Mystic* to me! The reason:
And people have watched and listened and sometimes even applauded. And even if you have never stepped onto a stage, I know that you understand about dialogues and monologues and timing. You understand about masks. You understand about trying to become someone else. You understand the unexpected joy of discovering yourself in the process. You understand speaking, and listening, and paying attention. You understand comedy and tragedy. You understand what it means to have an audience.
He didn't speak up against Labour's excessive borrowing then did he? He didn't agree with Tory "cuts" then did he?
Second, barring major technological breakthroughs, emissions of carbon dioxide, the main greenhouse gas, will rise for similar reasons. The EIA projects that America’s CO2 emissions will increase by 16 percent from 2009 to 2035. (The EIA is updating its projections, but the main trends aren’t likely to change dramatically.) Stopping Canadian tar-sands development, were that possible, wouldn’t affect these emissions.
A flower will tell a bud, on and on,
The Library of Shadows by Mikkel Birkegaard - Obviously it was the title that grabbed me here and the cover in the vein of The Shadow of the Wind didn't hurt either. "Imagine that some people have the power to affect your thoughts and feelings through reading—to seduce you with amazing stories, conjure up vividly imagined worlds, and manipulate you into thinking exactly what they want you to." This Thriller is placed in a bookstore following the murder of the main character's father. With the added psychic abilities related to books this is a book lovers wet dream for the first half. After that it was a real slog to finish it up as some parts just seemed thrown together and clichéd. It could have to do with the translation which is just on the side of okay. Not recommended unless the setting and abilities really set you off.
In March 2010, Malema was convicted of hate speech by the Equality Court for telling a Sasco (South African Students’ Congress) meeting that the woman who accused ANC president Jacob Zuma of rape had a “nice time” with him because in the morning she had “requested breakfast and taxi money”. His repeated insistence on the singing of the “Shoot the Boer” song and refusal to acknowledge that it may be offensive to others suggest a limited capacity for empathy. At the very least, he appears not to have a sense of the potential impact of his utterances on the feelings of others.
The films were ‘Daag’, ‘Deedar’, ‘Jogan’, ‘Amar’, ‘Andaz’, ‘Footpath’, ‘Devdas’, to name only a few.
The man from Imperial Consultants seemed to think we were thoroughly wet. Next, he said, will be a Ceiling Man from the insurance company who will advise on drying the ceiling and, eventually, will pronounce it safe to redecorate. Apparently if bits don’t fall off, and it doesn’t bulge, it will be all right to redecorate it as-is, without replastering, once it is thoroughly dry.
and contemplate the greater fears
Even back in KL, I am still busy with the home visiting, and also relatives and friends visiting our house. Busy with all the cooking and entertaining… :D
“Excuse me, are you John?” A voice behind John asked.
Pop across to The Stamping Ground where Julia has all you need to know if you want to join in and show your work space to the rest of us nosy crafters……..go on, you know you want too!
-Spritz Cookies
Then it was time for the fun part. Using the print out as a color guide I painted in the squares giving the feeling of that Impressionism style. Now I just need to put it in a frame and get it up on the wall.
When you correctly say croquet,
- Avoid sugar
¼ cup of black pepper
THE LONELINESS
The question facing UNISON members south of Hadrian's Wall is whether we shall be any part of the fight that still needs to be had.
Wednesday:
The chief Mossad agent in Japan, by the way, is a man named Michael Green. He’s a nasty piece of work, and we’re going to remove him from this country soon.
Blue Point
Now, on to our lovely samples:
Just a quick post, then, before the little munchkins wake up. It's the 17th of the month so it's time for the Waltzingmouse blog party again. The theme this month is 'New Beginnings' so I've made an engagement card for a couple who are soon going to embark on a 'new' life together.
Yea, when this flesh and heart shall fail,
If it’s dirty, and messy, and raucous, then we can do business.1234 is all about finding out what’s going on in the future. Get your cheap ticket from Noisey.com through seetickets here, and come say hi to the guys giving flyers to any and all hot girls; the flyers will look like this:
I have news! A couple of days ago I got an offer to study medicine at the University of Newcastle (2+ hours north of Sydney), which I accepted! After getting over the shock I am now beyond ecstatic. Basically what this means is:
As I chewed on the gooey goodness, I found myself smiling.
As the only player at the table, Wayne waited patiently for her to decide whether or not she wanted to continue. She upped the stakes. “Do you play?”
We microwaved it for the recommended 45 seconds, but nothing much happened. So we microwaved it for another 30 seconds. Nothing much happened. So, we went all out and microwaved it for a continuous 60 seconds.
2 cup sugar
attention is focused on the heir to the vampire throne. World leaders, the rich and famous, and VIPs from every corner of the globe have gathered in the nation’s capital to celebrate the momentous event.
For, when debts are payable, right or wrong,
It’s the heart (and hops) that counts, not the headwear, right? To me, the very best way to enjoy any holiday is with family and friends. Since the fam won’t be joining, I think we’ll all have to drink their share of Miller and eat their portion of fried chicken and watermelon. Patriotism demands sacrifice. I never said this would be easy.
Some think you should just "get over it" & "just deal with it" or "stop whining" or "how bad could it really be" or my fav - "well, I have pain too" as I have been told on occasion...
Kanakamma received medicines from OBI pharmacist and he also advised her about dosage and diet for diabetic. She was very happy and thanked Operation Blessings India for saving her from the sickness. She states that ‘from now onwards I can go for work regularly without any problem, because OBI has turned my sorrows into joy by providing me with the free treatment.’
Mistakes are essential. What's dysfunctional is when we repeat our mistakes. It's the difficult times that dictate our life. When life is easy, it's easy. When it's hard, what do we do? When we are stressed or angry, what do we do? These are the choices that affect our child. And ourselves. Children WILL forgive us, but don't take that for granted. When we make a mistake, we need to evolve. Life will be better than it ever was.
both of these are totally Aesthetic issues and don't affect the functionality at all. Just My OCD
To the many true friends that sincerely care about me and my happiness, I sincerely thank you (with all of my heart) for your support.
Do not get me wrong: I am proud of what I am doing and what I’m accomplishing; I am glad I am taking care of my life right now, and pushing myself forward on the right track. I will say, however, that my situation is just that: mine. I don’t judge anyone’s life, and I don’t want anyone judging mine. I know of the mistakes I made; I made them.
A Hispanic man, who appeared to be in his late twenties or early thirties, turned from his alligator butchering duties and responded, “Yeah, Pappy?”
This is Kaylee Nicole of Wild Flower. Since the lovely miss Charity is out on vacation, I'll be posting today! The outfit I chose was partly inspired by New Year's Eve night in London. Although I am from the states I am always pulling inspiration from other countries. England is a popular favorite for myself, fashion bloggers from there always have the best style! Anyways, hope you enjoy!
Contest entries will be accepted from now until 5 pm pacific time Tuesday, May 8th.
The digital world requires an opposite approach to creative content delivery than the old world of pre-internet presentation. Even for those without much awareness of the pre-digital world, the pace at which content is created—whether paintings or books or magazines—development still takes about the same amount of time. However, the thinking is totally different. The shift in presentation delivery changes how the content is presented in frequency and depth. Witness:
The whole of Thrissur round on pooram day is a giant conglomeration of people, moving around like a lost amoeba. Actually, all the people, especially the ones from Thrissur, love the elephants and they faithfully follow the pachyderm during the festivity, irrespective of the crowd around them. As a result, you are stuck in the giant ectoplasm which takes you for a ride around the festivity.
I know I have said it before, but we are just in love with Paisley around here. She is truly so very happy all the time. Her only need besides food and clean diapers, is just someone to look and talk to her. She then just smiles back and now is giggling so hard! We are really all smitten over her and we cherish every second of this sweet baby. Here are some things P is up to lately.
I know this is a very strange post, but I just had a revelation. Do friends that share secrets together also fart with no shame with each other? For some reason after I just typed that I pictured girls having a slumber party talking about boys, clothes and then farting like crazy and having a grand ol’ time. Sorry, I digress.
CLOSE UP, Sweaty crying and shaking with sobs.
Catastrophe.
This honor is such an inspiration to us, and one for which we can thank our exceptional clients and colleagues.
Why are we begging Jesus to be with us?
Ah, the middle book in a series… Typically, one worries about whether or not the installment would have “middle-book syndrome”. In this case, I wondered if I would like it more than the first book. Thankfully, for me, UNTIL I DIE was better. Much better.
I needed to get the perfect angle.
A source said, “A sequence was being picturised on a beach in Trinidad, West Indies where a set was erected in the sea, just a few feet away from the shore. Sushmita was quite reluctant about wading in the seawater to reach the sets as she didn’t want her legs and costume to get wet. Immediately, her boyfriend Muddasar Aziz, who is the film’s director, lifted Sushmita on his shoulders to keep her warm and dry and took her safely to the sets ensuring that she did not get wet at all. Even though the scene was okayed after about 12 retakes, Muddasar would wade through the water every time to carry Sushmita on his shoulders to take her back to her vanity van during breaks. Sushmita was thrilled on being given this super special treatment and her delight was quite evident.”
“My father died a virgin, and a woman I’ve never met gave birth to my twin.”
Patriots RB Kevin Faulk, @feezy_k: “Buddy Buddy one of the true warriors I can honestly say it was an honor to be his teammate. Always ready to give everything he had. #55 JS”
It is the Adi Shakti, the pure matter expansion and it all happened in the body Matter and cells of the physical body. I was not in a trance or anything like that. I was a very conscious witness to the entire experience.
Thus slowly, one by one,
Mrs Steerforth was particularly keen to cut down on wine after disgracing herself at a party on New Year's Eve, when she became more drunk than I have ever seen her.
*I served it with some buttered French bread. I also saw Rachael add a puffed pastry to the top of hers which looked really nice, but I couldn't find any in the store)
I came across this article in The Hollywood Reported today titled, “Jeremy Lin Lunches With Fired ESPN Writer Who Wrote Alleged Racial Slur.” The article talks about the writer who was fired for “…Calling Lin’s poor play in the loss that ended his magical run ‘A Chink in the Armor.’ It was perceived as a racial slur about Lin’s Chinese heritage…”
Nicola paused, startled. “Give me a minute,” she said, heading for the bathroom. At the door of the en-suite she paused, “what’s brought this on?”
:: The movie The Rocketeer is an entertaining little adventure flick that I enjoyed back when it came out in the early 1990s. However, I did not realize that it was based on a comic book, by a man named Dave Stevens. An omnibus edition collects the complete adventures of the Rocketeer, which were apparently serialized in several publications before at last appearing in a one-shot issue that resolved a cliffhanger. Unfortunately, that's all that exists of The Rocketeer; Stevens died of leukemia not long after finishing The Rocketeer. I was pleased to note the degree to which the film honored the retro homage tone of the comic. There's a lot to be fond of here.
That will do.
Ok pickle enough grumbling, get on to your card woman!!! lol
Liar liar, pants on fire.
Porque sacaba y temblaba
all that I have seen
As someone who was the caregiver for two aging parents, both of whom lived into their nineties, I found Feeding Mrs. Moskowitz and the The Caregiver: Two Stories by Barbara Pokras and Fran Pokras Yariv ($19.95, Syracuse University Press, softcover) a delightful experience. It is a candid and humorous look at aging. With 4.3 million Americans now taking on the role of caregivers to loved ones, there are plenty of stories to tell and share. The book is two novellas in which we meet Golde Moskowitz, an elderly Russian-born widow living alone with her memories and, in the second we visit a fictional upscale assisted-living facility in Hollywood and learn about it through the eyes of Ofelia Hernandez, a young Latina caregiver who relates the lives of those living there. It is well worth reading whether one is a caregiver or not, aging or not. This is a slice of life worth visiting. A Sacred Walk: Dispelling the Fear of Death and Caring for the Dying($15.95, A&A Publishing, softcover) by Donna M. Authers addresses the fact that all of us will die at some point and that all of us will be called upon to help a parent, spouse, friend or other loved one make the final journey. Helping them make the most of their last years, months or weeks can provide priceless memories, despite the fact that it will test you in every way. This is Authers’ personal story, but it is also ultimately everyone’s story when faced with this final stage of life.
It's a problem which occurs when people can't let go of their preconceived ideas of what their children are and it's bordering on "lack of acceptance".
“The thief cometh not, but for to steal, and to kill, and to destroy: I am come that they might have life, and that they might have it more abundantly. I am the good shepherd: the good shepherd giveth his life for the sheep. But he that is an hireling, and not the shepherd, whose own the sheep are not, seeth the wolf coming, and leaveth the sheep, and fleeth: and the wolf catcheth them, and scattereth the sheep. The hireling fleeth, because he is an hireling, and careth not for the sheep. I am the good shepherd, and know my sheep, and am known of mine. As the Father knoweth me, even so know I the Father: and I lay down my life for the sheep.” John 10:10-15
Now on to ideas for OHANA, La Chupacabras, and my friend's website.
RM407K ++ engagement party for daughter. RM80,000 for birthday bash, out of which, RM30,000++ for flowers. what about that holiday in Sydney - A$20,000 (RM65,100) a night penthouse at the newly-minted five-star Darling Hotel?
Right now we are up to three working sets with a total of 15 minutes trotting and 4 minutes cantering. I've starting doing some lateral work. Again, unconventional, but this horse thrives with it. He will be back to full flat work in January and the vet appointment will determine if he can jump. For his sake, I hope he can.
The talented Thai artisans use sustainable materials and traditional techniques to create contemporary wooden ware. They apply a dark brown stain on this mango wood bowl and carve three lovely butterflies.
Blue and yellow are perennial favorites at my house, and this table also gave me a chance to showcase some pretty salad plates I bought on my recent trip to Sur la Table in Austin. In addition to those cute rooster napkin rings, these plates caught my eye. They are made of melamine, and I love the design.
The best in my life! And it was the short version.
He turns his tide and goes back to what he once was
Yesterday Lauren and I ventured down to the Hester Street Fair and found what might be the best ice cream I've had all week, maybe even all month. It's called Guerrilla Ice Cream and they have some of the most genius flavors I've seen. I got the yogurt flavored sorbet topped with halvah and pomegranate molasses. Is your mouth watering yet? They also had Chai Masala topped with sliced almonds and candied fennel. The most visually impressive flavor was the dark chocolate/port wine flavor, which was then dressed up with cashews and bananas that they fosters-ized in front of you with a blow torch.
The babies I have now were born in a smaller tank, before I got the big tank up and running, so when I made the move, I left them in the smaller tank for a while. They had a chance to grow a bit without worrying about being eaten, which the next batch probably won't, but hopefully the lovely plants given to me by a very generous father of a friend will provide enough cover for the new babies to hide out and stay away from the adults.
And since we’re on the subject, you might be asking yourself whether raw tahini is better than roasted. It may surprise you to discover that the roasted sesame version is easier to digest than the raw type. If you are purchasing raw sesame butter or tahini, check to see if the processing included soaking and dehydrating the seeds before grinding. This crucial soaking step unlocks the enzyme inhibitors, which would otherwise make it difficult for us to digest all the good stuff inside the seeds. And the dehydrating step is essential to preserving the sprouted goodness, otherwise the tahini wouldn’t even make it on to the store shelves before turning rancid. Raw sesame butter that is just ground sesame seeds can cost a lot more money, but fail to deliver the nutrition, and give you a really bad case of indigestion to boot! If you read back to my post about soaking nuts, you’ll get the full story.
Andes Mint Chocolate Cookies
and/ or listen to 24/7 recorded message 1-800-931-0177
This room, though -- we're hoping it'll have plenty of use in a year or so, if we're lucky.
It is a very crucial post. He is called drawing and disbursement officer (DDO) which is a sensitive assignment. The executive engineer signs contracts on behalf of the government. A small mistake on his part can lead to a loss to the government exchequer. “It is imperative that only qualified persons should be promoted as executive engineers,” said an official.
13. Celebration For A Grey Day
Even just a few weeks ago, my neuro professor here in Dunedin was talking about a case study. The patient had had a limb amputated but still felt pain in his hand. I knew exactly how to cure him, even before the professor told the class.
Picture yourself on a state highway in the rural south in 1974. In the distance an apparition flickers on a drive-in screen. It’s a beautiful woman with long red hair and skin the color of mother’s milk. She lifts a 12-gauge to eye level and squeezes the trigger. It’s not a hallucination. It’s Claudia Jennings, a common sight on drive-in screens throughout the country in the 70’s and that rarest of things, a genuine female action star. The movie is GATOR BAIT, a huge hit that kept drive-in audiences coming back again and again. Like most movies that made it big on the chitlin’ circuit, GATOR BAIT really delivers. The story of a sexy swamp rat named Desiree who’s half woman and half savage, it features the scariest inbred hillbillies outside of the TEXAS CHAINSAW MASSACRE and a revenge plot that builds to a thundering, foot-stomping climax. As an actress Claudia Jennings doesn’t have a great deal of range, but then neither does a sawed off shotgun. Under the right circumstances both can be devastating. Jennings, who was a Playboy Playmate of the year, had an outstanding career in low-budget exploitation films before dying in a car crash at age 29. There’s never been another one like her. GATOR BAIT is a true drive-in classic. Don’t miss it. (Lars)
Barbara M. Habib, 49, New York, N.Y.
Shanti
You were all charm, cad. You–ever so gently–stirred a little threat in with your honey, even in your parting words. If your tone hadn’t been so sweet, your parting words about “try to get good rewards with your debit card” would have sounded oh-so bitter.
Had this dispictable crime not been enough, she the audacity, the audacity to ask if I needed pens.
I get home and le FP is sat on the sofa waiting for me. He has a big dumb smile on his face and in his lap is something particularly spectacular. A beautiful French Bulldog. Gorgeous.
Monday evening I realized something that I had sorta taken for granted or maybe not....Before I started with WW's On-line I was looking for something to help me with my cravings and had heard lots of things about PGX so I picked up a bottle to try....so I started and of course like other attempts at weight loss that didn't last long and the bottle sat on my counter for a couple of months. I guess I was in the process of getting both my mind and body ready for change.
The exhibit coincided with the release of Thompson’s final book of the same name and chronicles his life through his own photographs and memorabilia. “I hate to advocate drugs, alcohol, violence or insanity to anyone,” Thompson once said, “but they’ve always worked for me.” With a pricetag of $300, this was quite possibly the only time I’d ever get the chance to leaf through it.
Worship in a church setting is important. Worship during personal devotion time is important. Creative worship – like singing, dancing, painting or writing – are important. But worship is so much more than those things. It’s a heart attitude.
I've been thinking about how i want to develop my style
Richie Sambora – Guitar, Vocals
Then I did what I always do-I Googled it! I put in "Pottery Barn knock off" and came across a post describing this light from Overstock.com. I honestly can't see a difference, can you? I have bought several items from them in the past, including a queen mattress for our guest room (no tax and $1.00 shipping!). I have yet to be disappointed. I read the reviews for the light (very helpful) and ordered it right away. A week later I had this!
In 1995, I met Seth H. Moseley while working on a cable documentary about the Lindbergh Baby Kidnapping. I interviewed the legendary newspaperman about 1932, when he was a twenty-three year old cub reporter driving out to Hopewell, New Jersey right after the Lindbergh baby had been kidnapped. Because Seth had gone to Amherst College with Dwight Morrow, Anne Morrow-Lindbergh’s brother, his editor at The New York Journal thought Seth had an inside advantage over the 150 reporters on the scene. The editor was right and Seth obtained an exclusive interview with Charles A. Lindbergh hours after the world-famous aviator’s infant son was abducted. Seth Moseley had scooped the story of the twentieth century. But as I got to know and became friends with the intrepid former Associated Press reporter, I discovered Lindbergh was by no means Seth’s last exclusive.
Jump, jump, and ouch!
Chance did real well with the pup..of course the puppy followed him everywhere. Chance was patient and even laid by the outdoor kennel when I asked him to keep the puppy company while I swept out my garage. Ever tried sweeping with a puppy attached to a broom?
The committee concludes that legalizing euthanasia will not harm the value of respect for life because euthanasia will only be used in exceptional circumstances and there will be very few cases. And in any case, “La valeur du caractère Sacré de la vie a subi une transformation notable” (“The value of the sanctity of life has undergone a significant transformation”) relative to other values, which means that now respect for life itself doesn’t necessarily take priority.
"mighty..." "mighty..." "mighty..." "mighty..."
I will be taking a few days off from Le Clown on Fire. Basically, I will be putting all my efforts on the custody battle for my son. As the first hearing is this coming Thursday, Le Clown and his lawyers have a great deal of ground to cover. I will pop by Friday, to say hello. Don’t you go thinking it’s because Le Clown likes you. Le Clown is one cold hearted bastard.
I decorated the outside with a snowflake, a button and the sentiment is from the "Four Holidays" stamp set.
Nick did not have a good run yesterday. He ran in the four by eight and Nick is not a sprinter. He is a distance runner. He has already suffered from shin splints and yesterday runners cough that attacked his lungs and airway so severely he vomited! He was unable to run the mile or the two mile. We are hopeful once he is over Spring break he will be able to get back on track. He is still looking at colleges, primarily in Colorado and Kansas. We want him to end his high school years on a high note. We want him to run well and be strong and healthy.
For more information on how to handle this latest dilemma for patent practitioners, check out my audio visual presentation on "Structure, Function, and the Importance of Claim-Type Differentiation." See slide #7 for a summary, or, better yet, invite me to present this material to your organization in person.
On the way, they met the Roach. They had the same conversation with the Roach.
Life's challenges are not supposed to paralyze you, they're supposed to help you discover who you are.
I hope you enjoyed one of my first scrapbook pages. It's a scary thing but I had so much more fun that I thought I would! I'm going to be making me another page!
4) I have a cousin who...
‘The PER.C6 cell line was made by Ron Beut and Frits Fallaux in 1995 from embryonic retina cultures that were made from fetal tissue’ (part of the eye of the unborn baby). I have a copy of this document should anyone want me to email it to them.
A cute baby card :) I have no idea who will get it...no babies on the horizon that I know of. The little giraffe is a HOTP stamp that's been hiding in my drawer for a while and hadn't been christened. I stamped him with Versamark & SU Night of Navy then clear embossed him so I could colour.
Two sessions will be held Saturday, June 23 from 12 to 5 p.m. and Sunday, June 24 from 12 to 5 p.m. at Little 5 Points Community Center, 1083 Austin Avenue Northeast, Atlanta, GA 30307.
As he says about the Soviets and Cubans: “They left Africa with empty hands. All that is left of them are a few pieces of war scrap scattered throughout the countryside of southern Angola.”
19 May 1973
Now Hanson Lane is near where I grew up as a child with my Mum & Dad.I delivered newspapers there as a teenager. I worked for several years for Social Services just around the corner....anyway........I knew little of the previous drama...........
In this broken world full of broken people…
HTC One X is the first Smartphone in India to use with Ice Cream Sandwitch on- board. Along with android 4.03 versions, there is a delightful blend of ICL and Sense in one X making your usage seem even more convenient. The 1.5 GHz processor sports 5 cores where one of them especially works to reduce the battery consumed.
ATTORNEY: How can you be so sure, Doctor?
~ Divide into 2 portions and fold into the coffee mixture and vanlla mixture respectively.
I was asked what these little "sticks" were. They are actually the candles from the package of Pink Paislee "Soiree" dimensional stickers.
P.P.
When the enemy becomes more ruthless and harsher than it was in the past, then we have to protect ourselves in smarter and different ways, but still according to the standards that we have set for ourselves.
April 2012 - Page Loads 30,790 Unique Visits 20,518
About half of this first volume is dedicated to Murphy's lengthy biographical essay on Johnson, in which he sets the record straight on Johnson's life after the publication of a previous biography that he felt misrepresented his friend. Murphy's biography sometimes goes a little overboard with praise, but for the most part seems to be a fair impression of Samuel Johnson as a man and doesn't hide all his warts and flaws. Johnson's slow and often poverty-striken rise from the son of a bookseller to England's most well-known man of letters makes for interesting reading, and Murphy hits all the literary high points of Johnson's career, including the extended Dictionary project.
the dearest
“Princess,” the farmer sighed lovingly.
In terms of beer, who'd they miss?
Should go get ready now....have to go round up all my kids and head off to find out what I am doing wrong...
-Go through all of your photographs and save them online. I’ve personally been through two computers in two years, and I know how devastating it is to lose photographs, videos, and special memories. There are several websites and programs out there for you to upload photos, or just simply save them to a flash drive. In addition to saving them online or on an external drive, print all of your photos periodically and place them in protective albums. These are good items to put in a safe.
Whatever my hubs does or doesn't do is almost irrelevant. Every decision I make, every word I say, every thought I think, every action I perform is to flow out of ONE holy motivation: reverence for God.
We won't have a thing
The Burger Joint is an instant hit amongst the students. In our modern day of fast food, we can’t seem to shake our craving for a good burger.
Don’t show your teeth until you can bite.
Where is this Era of Responsibility you yak about?
Stay tuned to the blog for more information about ICS as it nears release.
Importantly, this organisation are also petitioning government to change the screening procedure for GBS – so sign the petition – the link is on the main page of the website here along with a load of important information. Read it, and if you agree SIGN IT!
While I was waiting for Dawn, I ran around the house grabbing those last few things to put in the hospital suitcase (things I would not even touch until I unpacked them a few days later) and decided to finish the vacuuming so the carpet guy could still come in the morning. Yep, here’s me, in labor, vacuuming the house at 4 am. Dawn’s going to think I’m nuts! Then again, in her line of work, I’m sure nothing surprises her anymore. She’d told me of one mom who ordered and consumed a pizza in her waterbirthing tub at 9 cm dilated. Wow!
I'll probably get some kind of award. So after my triumph, I decided to get started on my work, because I'm totally a dedicated public servant like that....
On the opposite side of the spectrum, Yustman’s co-star, Amber Heard, is not only beautiful (same as Yustman), but a powerful character that demands attention from the viewer. Heard’s advantage over Yustman isn’t huge, but it is clear: Heard’s Stephanie is written more completely than Yustman’s Ellie. Heard shows a soft side at the beginning of the film, finding success in playing above stereotypes. Her work is not stellar, but she does a nice job, and given a better script, could shine in the future. Karl Urban comes off as the grizzled veteran of the group, and though his character is absolute rubbish, he does a fine job with what he is given. I will be interested to see him in the upcoming Judge Dredd film, Dredd, as the titular character.
If you want a clinic on how not to write or perform a horror comedy, you can watch this. If you want to hear one legendary funnyman, one hardworking producer, and this squirrely nut trying to crack each other up to compensate for the lack of laughs, this one is right up your alley. There is a retroactive poignance to this track since neither me nor HOSTEL producer Scott Spiegel were aware that Fred Travalena was valiantly fighting cancer when he sat down with us, and would ultimately lose that fight a few months later; he coulda fooled us, as he was fast with the quips and honest with his assessments on the state of comedy. It's essentially the career retrospective interview that would not have happened were it not for a movie that Fred probably would have been happy to forget, so something good came out of it all.
Alex Fergusson began by naming youth unemployment the biggest problem facing Dumfries and Galloway at the moment. Like Elaine, he attacked the SNP’s cuts to college funding and described how they had harmed DG College saying that funding and resources are too focused on the central belt. When asked about his opinion on the future of tuition fees in Scotland he questioned the sustainability of the current arrangement: “If you are to continue universally free tuition fees, is it right that it should be at the expense of college funding?”. He went on to applaud the work of the Dumfries Conservative lead council and claimed they were prioritising jobs and young people despite their increasingly tight budget. However he did point out that apprenticeships and vocational college courses needed corresponding jobs at the end of them, and criticized the lack of construction work and such like going on in Dumfries. When asked what would have her party done to help young people in the UK, Ruth Davidson made it clear that education played an important role for employment amongst young people. “It’s all about how we teach in schools, you know if the teachers are teaching properly”. She also made it clear that she wanted to focus on rural areas for employment in doubling job opportunities for young people. Like other members we interviewed, Ruth mentioned the apprenticeships that are being made available for 16,000 young people in the UK; a small but good start to lowering the unemployment rate.
I’m sure other sports have made their way in and out of my life (kind of like the music of Ashlee Simpson), but let’s get onto the interesting stuff. Let’s write about some SPORTS!
it is however, where most of the labor happens and thank goodness my husband is
This girl tormented the hell out of me nearly every day for the better part of the fifth grade. During the lunch hour she’d seek me out just to hassle me, and after school I had the misfortune of sharing a travel route home with her, so she always had plenty of opportunity to poke, push, punch, pinch, trip, tease and generally torture me.
To think I'll never watch the door
it is alright.
_Ubaldo Vitali, 67, Maplewood, N.J. Fourth-generation silversmith, conservator and scholar who restores silver masterworks and creates original art.
The city of Trondheim, which lies in the middle of the country, was the medieval capital of Norway. Its cathedral is the finest example of medieval architecture in the country. Trondheim Public Library is the third largest public library in Norway. On the web it presents itself statistically as follows
The entire furor over the crowds PTI amassed in its Karachi rally died to a barely audible snore in the face of two million DPC activists cheering and sloganeering at their recent rally in Karachi,where a literary festival was also underway the same time and was effectively ignored. The Council condemned foreign intervention in the country,delivered verbal knock outs to India especially towards warming relations via MFN,declared undying love for Dr. Aafia Siddiqui without having a single woman present in the rally,and warned the Government against reopening NATO Supply routes into Afghanistan. A ten point agenda reinforced the importance of the Two Nation Theory outlined the demands and solutions for Pakistan’s prosperity and ended with avowals of ‘crushing’ India to smithereens. Peacefully of course without wondering how you ‘crush’ someone peacefully. As we have it,DPC Chairman JUI(S) chief Maulana Samiul Haq,Jamaatud Dawa Chief Hafiz Muhammad Saeed,PML chiefs of their own factions Ejazul Haq and Sh Rashid Ahmad,former DG ISI Lt Gen (retd) Hameed Gul,Jamaat Islami Amir Syed Munawar Hasan and PTI central leader Ejaz Chaudhry all seem to be very vocal DPC diehards and have found a new platform to spew and foment hatred from in the form of DPC.
My words are precious, won’t lose their comity even in the moments most treacherous. So, I choose to keep them ensconced in my diary, safe, you may have successfully wounded me, but you won’t get to even touch them, believe me. After all, if I vituperate, cuss and if I lash, then what difference from you will I have?
(6) In biblical times, writers who had some conception of a subject they wished to give expression to would turn naturally and as a matter of course to a traditional literary form as a vehicle for doing so.
That love will be all that I need to carry me through the storms, now getting into
Kaye
It will show a crumble like mixture.
“Piper says because we don’t act like little kids he’ll pay us what he pay’s Mike. Like we family.”
Williams and Jackson were convicted of attacking a woman outside a Dallas bar in November 1983 and sentenced to life in prison. The woman was forced into a vehicle at gunpoint, sexually assaulted, shot and left for dead in a field.
What has been a particular surprise in my role as Community Reporter has been the number of good projects that are going on in the fight to alleviate mental health problems. The role has opened my eyes to the number and range of projects that are tackling this issue something that is not widely reported in the media. Hopefully we as reporters are doing our bit and I am glad to be part of this endeavour.
Secret Societies have existed throughout the course of history, each of them with different aims and with different roles in society. While the Egyptian mystery schools were part of the Egyptian institution, other groups were secret due to their subversive and conspiratorial aims. These two next quotes, written by two famous political figures, describe these opposing views on Secret Societies:
“Sure I have; I told you years ago.”
In a statement April 24, 2012, the UNWTO said both have “signed a memorandum of understanding to step up cooperation against this form of exploitation”.
I hear other parents talk about how report cards and parent teacher conferences are like a parent's payday. If that is the case I get paid shit. I have to gear up for a couple of days for these things. It takes a lot of calming meditation, yoga, and Valium. Okay so really I forgo most of the calming meditation and yoga but I did hit my boxing bag until it fell down.
The inside had some sort of paper glued to it. The hose and a scrub brush took care of it
Alternate: Christopher Harbster (quit before the National Poetry Slam)
Now, I love technology. I'm one of the original girl-geeks of my generation... but this? It just seems a tad overboard in the insaniac department.
I would like to express my deep appreciation to don Howard Lawler, don Roberto Acho Jurama, and all the family and crew at SpiritQuest for their service, sensitivity, and love during my life-changing experiences with the Mother of All Plants, in the heart of the greatest forest on Earth.
Donald Trump? Are you kidding me? Betty White? Again? Motley Crue? Really? Dogs? Polar bears? Monkeys? Does anyone have an idea anymore?
The common expression of the “Four Regs” is: (1) no meat eating, (2) no intoxication, (3) no illicit sex, and (4) no gambling. I would like to explain these rules more deeply and thoroughly than is common.
Shumilina AV. Menstrual and reproductive functions of workers with occupational exposure to formaldehyde. Gig Tr Prof Zabol 1975; 12: 18-21.
Her altruism was more than I could handle. “Look, I don’t
Serves 3-4
Another note of mine: A cheesecake definitely requires a stand up mixer, not the time to use a hand mixer and I have found that blending it for a long time makes for a much creamier cheesecake.
2 teaspoons active dry yeast
In other words, what could I gain from watching the Oscars that I wouldn’t glean from reading a list of the winners tomorrow morning? Especially as the Academy works to disqualify more and more of critics’ favorites. First, Carlos wasn’t eligible for Best Foreign Language Film because portions had aired on French TV. The larger irony here is the ambition of Olivier Assayas’ four-hour biopic could only be financed by those familiar with the longer format (TV executives), which then met universal acclaim from film festivals and silver screen distribution in the U.S.
from when I was a child. But the way she understands angels
I took a picture of these poppies while we were on a bike ride last week. They are pretty invasive in a home garden so I enjoy them elsewhere. :)
I stood there looking at this for several minutes, wondering how the pine cone got where it was, and why some one would put it there, if that was what had happened. Then, a stronger gust of wind came along, and explained everything to me.
If you are keen, do contact me at precious.darling@yahoo.com.sg for more information. Thank you.
It’s kinda like putting your heart on a pedestal – if your standards & expectations are a little lower, the impending fall won’t hurt as much. If you’re the 2% that’s lucky enough to not fall off the pedestal – congrats. Not only did you not hit the ground and get hurt, but you’re literally higher than everyone else – which is exactly what being in love with the right person feels like. I’ve felt that – like no one or no thing can touch you and all is well with the world. Good for you.
Here are some interesting articles and a fun guessing game related to the crazy housing market in Vancouver:
Some fun uses of this holder could be for pencils, or for my flowers that are in long vines. I thought it would be fun to showcase them this way so I could see them and make it look like I had a little mini flower arrangement on my scrap desk.
Founders CBS Imperial Stout (Canadian Breakfast) 10.6%
Why, you don't even holler.
Spoon a thick layer of salt onto your serving dish. Snip off the tops of the eggs with small scissors then stand then in the salt. Top with a small heap of the bacon mixture and serve immediately.
have laid their claim
Back at the Needle, Borsten is giving a great explanation of the history of he and his daughter. Eight years ago, in 2042 (thus making this 2050), Borsten worked as a national security administration liaison to the top-secret project Cronos, tasked with building a time machine. They were eventually successful and decided to send one of their scientists three years into the future, to 2045. The man vanished and never returned.
Well, back to class anyway!
The girls bottle feeding the orphan lambs ...
We find the individuals to be completely unique, as Mary Oliver speaks of daisies and lions and musical names, the distance between us is shortened and we are reminded of our familiarity with one another in a world alike a field filled with the same type of flowers but which are all different in their own beautiful, extraordinary ways.
Self-promotion:
following an exasperating decade of postwar economic turmoil that would be exacerbated by the coming worldwide Depression.
My nap didn’t last long and the half hour seemed to fly by. Once back in the kitchen, like always, I gathered up everything I needed.
Here is the trailer for David Tennant's next on-screen outing as James Arber in The Decoy Bride. The film will hit cinemas on March 9th with a DVD released on March 12th.
A few months ago, Lisa from LVStyle contacted me to see if I’d be interested (!!! if I’d be interested, ha!) in blogging for the magazine’s new website. HECK YES. I decided to go with a “live local, day in the life, plus a recipe” format for content.
Truth of the matter is, I wanna go around with purple hair and un ugly face that nobody cares about because my flow is so sick. I want to run about talking about my cunt in graphic detail with a crazy beat in the background.
But don’t overmix it or else jadi scrambled eggs pulak nanti, hehehe.
Was it because I was just ‘too far from their window’?
"I didn't know you wanted any" Sometimes you just can't win!
� Accountable Position Brokers - in Australia
Immediately, I wanted to know what kind of wand I would get and what House I would be Sorted into. I thought this would happen right away, even though it doesn’t in the first book. So I had to wait until Chapter 5 to get all my supplies for Hogwarts. I picked a barn owl as my pet/avatar, because they didn’t have any snowy owls like Hedwig. After getting everything else, I got my wand at Ollivander’s. It is 11 inches, spruce with unicorn core, surprisingly swishy.
Arkansas will beat LSU on their home field.
Andrew Kohut, president of the Pew Research Center, said that more than two decades of polling shows that a solid, if fluctuating, majority of Americans believe government has a responsibility to care for the poor.
1 Tbsp butter, melted
To create the very best Wedding Day Party, Tea with Mary Kate has sought out a few quintessionally British favourite essentials – things that will guarantee any event is transported into a rather splendid Royal Wedding Celebration:
The revival of 1920's hair can be seen everywhere....from the 2012 high fashion runways to this season's hottest television shows. Wavy styles have been spotted on the red carpet and even on the big screen....have you seen the previews for the upcoming remake of The Great Gatsby? Wow. Clearly, the Jazz Age is having a major fashion moment.
Gratitude and relief.
What we deem offensive is probably about what you would expect. Amazon Digital Services, Inc. reserves the right to determine the appropriateness of Titles sold on our site.
Next there was the water. Pleasantly warm, and with a max depth of 4.5 feet I was safe no matter where in the pool I ended up. The ultimate test was sharing. Others suddenly showed up, and that didn't work out too well, so I called it a day. Knowing I might have missed a small part of the pool I suppose I'll have to go back tomorrow...
Somewhere around 1:30 AM, I came up with a fun poll to put up on the ever more crowded right side of the blog. I decided that I should wait until this morning, just in case the poll idea might prove really really dumb once the sun was shining.
Now we learn that a U.S. funded agency, the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA) has become mired in a new scandal involving numbers for the Great Lakes region that misrepresent average temperatures there. The latest word as of Wednesday, August 11, is that NOAA has removed an entire NOAA-16 satellite data set from its website--leading some to wonder if a decade’s worth of North American data will be discredited.
For some reason I didn’t initially investigate any further into her catalogue, but then one Friday at work I was talking to another friend who loved Ann Peebles. The next day, on my way into town to the shops, I decided I simply had to buy a Peebles record. My first stop was Reckless in Berwick St, which still had a basement where a box of soul singles sat on the counter. Having inherited not only my dad’s hoarding tendencies, but his acute sense of relative value, I’ve never bought many 7″s (or “45s” as we must trendily refer to them now) and 9/10 times I deliberately avoid looking beyond the LP and 12″ sections in any shop. I was on a mission this time though and miraculously, as I began to flick, there it was, second record in the box, as if I’d just willed it there. I excitedly parted with my £3 and while I have no memory of what if anything else I bought that day, I remember it was definitely raining. Getting the record home, I had a bonus discovery with the equally brilliant b-side, part of whose intro is the backbone to a GZA track I was a bit obsessed with at the time (a huge proportion of early RZA production relies on the Hi back catalogue). In contrast to the a-side, the song is much more positive than its title indicates: she’s bidding goodbye to her troubles and sadness, or rather, as is more customary for Peebles, telling them to piss off.
False Lashes from Born Pretty Store
But I guess that doesn't make for very good television because all I saw from Paris was a bunch of hootin' and hollerin'. At least no one showed their boobs.
I am making this for my MIL and she didn't care for the star fabric in block #7 as it is more 'primitive' in nature, so that one I will have to do over, then I will have to sew all the blocks together and also all the sashings and border fabric, which as you can see in the pic below, there are quite a few of them!!
It is also the original inspiration for my 'Storybook Cornwall' series, and so this is probably one of the most meaningful paintings I've ever done.
Some very cool lens flare looked like a low flying ufo with the Android.
Excuse my french! But its been a HELL of a day! I won`t go into any detail, but talk about stress! If I`m not all gray under that hair color then no one is.
But one day, Ethan is afraid someone has found them. He saw a gray shadow moving in the background. He doesn’t want to say anything, thinking his friends will make fun of him, but soon his friends notice and they go to investigate. What they find, leaves chills running up their spines. Someone has left a strange puzzle of bones near the clubhouse.
Next Friday, 13 April I will share some happy news about a GD spot and the layouts that I made for it!
Another aspect of a news feature is the opportunity to present the writer’s opinion. While this is dependent on the type of news feature and the type of readership, the news feature offers the writer a chance to subtly voice his or her opinion in relation to the topic. As the news feature includes more additional research and a larger picture, it is more ethical for the writer to include their opinion. Using the ‘Massacre in Kandahar’ by Jon Lee Anderson as an example again, he subtly looks at the attitudes of soldiers, suggesting a changing psychological view of killing. He finishes off his story: “War has a way of making all kinds of killings possible.” While the piece is not overflowing with personal opinion similar to an opinion column, writers can put their own view-point within their writing. Obviously you would need to check with your editor first.
First i am going to tell you my thoughts and show a few pics at how it worked. Then, i think i will pull a
Happy 63rd birthday 'ling' (short for darling) :P
E: The Confederate Constitution (1861). . . . .pg. 253
I’m so happy that I did, that I get to share what I feel with so many people. I really do hope I’m helping make a change in someone’s life, which is my aim. Inspiring people to do better, has always been number one for me.
Michael Messier, 8 Sheldon Dr, W. Brookfield, MA, age 21
She'd only realised that morning. She needn't be a social historian to know the significance, the implications. He, on the other hand, was a geeky bachelor from Sciences. He'd be oblivious.
And then I share here at Hallelujahs. The gift of writing is not mine. It's more of a creative outlet for me. I try to share the good stuff...the random fun - the ups and downs - and joy that every day brings. There are so many opportunities in a day to be thankful. Little moments...like waking up and being able to hop out of bed because your body is working (HERE and HERE)...turning on a warm shower to get your muscles moving and wake you up...turning on the faucet for fresh water to cook and clean with...staring into the beautiful eyes of your little buddy, full of relief that I know there is food in the fridge to feed his hungry belly. And the big moments...going on family adventures to the pumpkin patch (HERE)...enjoying fresh fallen snow together (HERE)...soaking in a trip to the farm (HERE)...or the awesome dance parties my husband DJs around here in the evenings and on weekends. Those are the moments that create an overwhelming sense of gratitude for me. I don't have enough time in the day to share all of the moments that make me shout, "Hallelujah!" I am in constant awe of God...for what he's done for me, for us all, and the never-ending grace, forgiveness, and peace he provides when I continually fall short as a human being.
A word about the cherry preserves - if you are not using your own super delicious homemade cherry preserves (I didn't either), please look for someone else's super delicious homemade cherry preserves. Commercial jams and jellies are not what we are looking for with these cookies; a good, solid, real cherry flavor (with actual real cherries), preferably naturally sweetened, jam or preserve can be found in local specialty shops or at farmer's markets everywhere, and I suggest using one of those to fill these tasty little cookies.
and why for girls only?
Lo doesn't know who she is. Or who she was. Once a human, she is now almost entirely a creature of the sea -- a nymph, an ocean girl, a mermaid -- all terms too pretty for the soulless monster she knows she's becoming. Lo clings to shreds of her former self, fighting to remember her past, even as she's tempted to embrace her dark immortality. More…
Daryl goes crazy and murders a couple for having kissed in an elevator previously. Murders them with an endlave. How ~dark~ and ~edgy~ he is.
“We were in talks with some international brands. But most of the popular brands have their own plans to enter the Indian market and were not keen on licensing. This has prompted us to plan our own product under the Turtle brand,” Mr Amit Ladsaria, Director of the company, told Business Line. He was in the city to open its second exclusive store, with plans to open about six more in this fiscal.
As for the Greek bondholders, Papandreou has given them a copper-bottomed excuse not to turn up at the hairdressers. (I don’t believe they were ever going to, but that’s another matter for history to think about). Meanwhile, I have it on good authority that all of the remaining PIIGs have indeed made discreet enquiries about the chances of a special Happy Hour at the hairdressers at some later date – precisely what Merkel always feared.
While many people quickly think of the tablet as being more for personal use – for Facebooking, watching movies, playing Words With Friends, and generally having fun with a bunch of really cool apps – it’s the workplace that is perhaps benefiting most from this new and ever-evolving technology.
Did you notice them up there?
that had toiled hard to get what it had won, and that had to hold it now
My environment has changed. The only things I heard through the walls of the house I lived in growing up was the wail of sirens from police cars and ambulances, or the tuned motor of a car or motorcycle. There was the occasional sound of a plane flying over. Maybe a person making a U-turn in the front yard since we had no sidewalk, only gravel.
In the United States:
Open laptop and connect to power source.
I was becoming more radical in my politics trying to figure out my place in the world, my mixed race heritage, my sense of class, and perhaps most profoundly my definitions of manhood, of fatherhood, of gender.
This Thursday, we will celebrate our 15th anniversary. We have now outlasted both of our first marriages combined. :-)
When I heard that Ms. Burden had superblocking concerns with respect to Battery Park City’s Teardrop Park I wanted to take a look at what these were.
I'm Glass Half Full, and have a vested interest in Coach Tort's vision. It's Glen Sather I don't trust. But now that Coach Torts has a new three year pact (was that ever made official?), I couldn't be happier to have someone behind the bench who can and does exert influence on Glen Sather. Tom Renney never could. He was subservient. Not Coach Torts - He's no Company Man.
I'm thankful for:
* Shenzen
good, for me, I thought, so I stuck it on the art
“Also checked his phone number…Salisbury, MD. The weird thing is, this area is mostly strip malls and stores.”
In the meantime, make a syrup by dissolving the sugar with the honey and the dark chocolate in a saucepan over medium heat. Bring to the boil, then reduce and keep simmering, without stirring for around 2 minutes. Do not leave the stove at this stage or you will end up with burnt caramel….don’t ask me how I know…
Like Silent Cal before me, I will stump the land,
When did you first know you wanted to write books?
What pisses me off is that its expected. “You’re the one who’s home, so its your job to clean the house”. Since when??? I wonder how much of this is the expectations that mothers raise their sons to have. What to expect out of a “good wife”. How much of this is because this is what religions teach their men and women? A woman’s place is at home taking care of home and family. And how much of this is just traditions that have been cemented in place.
Yup, they are, in some cases.
These chalkboard plant stakes will assist you with labeling your garden this summer! The best thing about them is that they don’t cause glare from the sun AND they are reusable! Get this set of 5 plant stakes from bradensgracewallart on Etsy for just $12.
"What? They walked out? Rescued by a fairy godmother? You have to be kidding. You've been staying up too late bucko. Watching too many horror flicks, the walking dead. Jesus save me!"
French is the classic and can work in all types of rooms.
It has been proven and tested, time and time again, that those who emulate their bosses; who learn a thing or two from them; observe what they are doing, how they manage everyone on the team, how they think, how they make sound decisions, how they talk, how they walk, how they speak with clients, etc. can better follow in the footsteps.
I admit I'm not following the conventional cheesemaking recipes. Instead, I've been following the hard cheese directions in The Little House Cookbook, Since this is an historic type recipe, it doesn't use a standard, commercial cheese culture. This works for me because I want to make cheese with ingredients readily available on the homestead. In other words, I'm in search of a sustainable cheese. For a culture, I've been experimenting with leftover whey from previous batches. This particular cheese was made with whole, raw, goat milk (skim doesn't make very tasty cheese in my opinion), and whey from previous cheese #9, which had used whey from a batch of mozzarella.
moved through fog so thick
This was done during the jim crow era – All black men were “boy” and “boys”.
Here are some of Dr. Gunderson’s thoughts on Nina Cucina Lifestyle Eating:
Each of these performances has presented a wide range of musical selections as well as interdisciplinary collaborations with dancers, spoken-word artists, and actors.
I can no longer do it alone!
I was very fortunate and blessed to get my 1st Kalydeco dose in the mail today.
Willin' Drillin' and Chillin' because I love my Dentist.
--Women shouldn't be priests/cut their hair/wear pants or shorts/work outside the home/learn to drive/shave their legs/swim in public/wear makeup, or leave the house when menstruating. And they should probably just go ahead and wear a burka, just to be safe.
After the editor calls and has emailed you the deal points, you might ask for a bit more information. Ask for the format (as in, will it be hardcover, original trade paperback, or original mass market). Ask for the price point and ask for the estimated initial print run.
I’m so all alone,
I will be pontificating about Super Bowl advertising on a TV show tomorrow and I'd like to be able to reference the opinions of ad and marketing "professionals" (that's you!)
As Iran reigned downed hundreds of thousands of missiles on locations around the Middle East they also take out the US Navy build up in the Persian Gulf by firing torpedoes from their underwater silos as US military commanders are dumbfounded as to where the torpedoes are coming from. Unlike the EMP missiles strikes, word of these attacks reached back to the homeland. After the naval threat was neutralized Iran deployed thousands of sea mines into the Gulf and shuts off the straight Hormuz.
Here are the design team's stunning cards for your inspiration!
Richard Farnsworth (The Straight Story)
Before the King eternal,
JERUSALEM: Tzipi Livni, who recently lost her position as leader of the opposition, has resigned from Israel's parliament, the Knesset, but said she was not quitting public life.
Our new church has been wonderful. We picked the city based on the church. It is exactly what we wanted and we couldn't be happier. We are meeting new friends very quickly. We finally have an overlap of school, church, and activities within the city.
I said, “It must be wonderful to have a daughter” She agreed. I have one son, whom I adore more than life itself, but daughters are different. I have a lucky ring, it is actually quite the bling. I wear it all the time. It was given to me by a former client. She was dealing with a very ill son and a dying husband. She had a healthy son, but I remember thinking, ‘this woman needs to be daughtered’ so I did, way beyond the scope of my professional life. So she gave me crazy fancy ring. “I don’t have a daughter, I want someone I care about to wear this” So after refusing about 7 times, and when the whole family agreed, I took it. I didn’t sell it even when I really needed the cash because it means so much to me when I look at it and think of why she wanted me to have it. Bon-Bon sometimes daughters me, it is lovely. Tom-Tom has exquisite taste.
...our food choices are far from free, in no small part because of the commercial and cultural power of the food industry. Weaned as most of us are on Big Food's free speech, we ought to be suspicious of our instincts when it comes to food.
43. Nah one time a fire mek peas boil. Some things take a long time to be completed.
I now take a class called MACS225 – Australian Content production, with Kate Bowles, so this is an issue that I have discussed all session among my classmates. As Kate has said to me before, there is issues with funding of Australian content, we rely almost solely on funding contributions from the Federal Government who do not wholeheartedly back projects, we export our bigger actors but still need to meet the minimum requirement of Australian content on our television and film screens (Kate Bowles, lecture week 8).
Total Size: 97 Mb
My next blog posts are dedicated to identifying these opportunities and providing solutions for them.
The film is in German with English subtitles but please don’t let that put you off, it’s a cracker. I’ve included the German poster as it better reflects the film, the UK DVD cover would make you think that this is all about airplane battles, which isn’t the case at all.
For Hwart's Bitter, the caramel malt and the bittering hops were both reduced by at least 40%, hopefully evening out the malt/hop ratio while cutting the sweetness. We'll have to see. As for now, it's bubblin' away.
Far stronger than all this are simple, empirical observations. Rapley points out that sea temperatures are rising exactly as predicted by the climate models. Climate change, more than over-fishing, has been found to be behind the fall in North Sea fish stocks. Arctic ice is melting faster than expected. And here’s one fact that should give the most hardened bone-head pause: Arctic shipping lanes are to be re-opened. Summer sea ice in 2007 was 40% down on the average, and shipping companies are planning much faster routes between Europe and Asia using the Arctic Ocean. These guys are not exactly tree-huggers. And yet many denialists still insist on saying there’s no problem with the Arctic melt.
it should be easy hey...but nope...it wasn't...
Portland. I can’t really say anything aside from I utterly love this city. It gives me the same feeling I had when I arrived in Vancouver four years ago.
You see, over the summer, we altered the house. When the final child went off to university, it was either that or moving. So we shifted the kitchen, changed the sitting room, did a few things up. We’re very pleased with the result, but it wasn’t until I began to prepare for Christmas that I fully realised how gains entail losses. The doors of the ‘old’ house were pricked full of small holes from Christmas drawing pins; one wall was blotted with strange stains from enthusiastically lit puddings; the hall carpet was pitted with evidence of the Advent candle’s waxy wobbles; and the kitchen table bravely bore the heavy scars of a wreath that went up in flames more than a decade ago.
It really doesn't matter how long you quilt, or if you even get a project done. The key is just getting on your machine every day.
***** If you like a creamier carbonara, make a cream sauce and add about 1/2 cup of it to the mixture. (You can always save the rest of the cream sauce for something else.) I did this by making a light roux - melting 3 tablespoons of real butter, and adding 3 tablespoons flour. Whisk constantly for 4-5 minutes over low heat. Pour in enough cream, until its the right consistency and color, and thickens nicely. Then grab a big handful of freshly shredded parmigiano reggiano cheese (maybe 1/2 cup) and whisk until its melted. Put aside until you're ready to mix it in. Make sure it's all well mixed with the pasta, bacon/garlic mixture and toss well. I think it improved the dish quite a bit, even if it did mess up more equipment for me to clean.
Whoo! 125 (now 126) followers? How ever did I get so lucky to have so many people look at my blog?
Sheik Yousuf Al-Qaradhawi: “Some friends quoted a hadith that says Islam would conquer Rome. Does this mean that we will vanquish the Europeans once again?”
Food - Ginsters pasties (quelle surprise)
Now, loser fans that have to get your hate out behind the shield of Internet anonymity, suck it. And you know what “it” is.
Don’t forget to include a link to your card on the Paper Pretties Blog, so everyone can see it too. You don’t have to use Paper Pretties stamps to play, but of course if you have them we would love to see you use them. One random participant will receive a Paper Pretties Stamps set … see the Paper Pretties Blog for more details.
So let’s return to the starting point of this post.
Knowing we would be couchless by the weekend, my husband and I went couch shopping.
-The giveaway will close on July 12th
On reading this, Jellicoe Road immediately received the position of Favourite (a position it shares with a few others, because I am indecisive (I just can’t choose!) and/or big-hearted (I love you all!) depending on which way you want to look at it). Which makes writing a review that’s not just “I LOVE THIS BOOK!!!” really hard, but here goes.
Today I was able to dedicate some time to getting my Trollbloods army complete. In taking one step closer to completion, I finished up the Troll Axer and Troll Impaler, both light warbeasts for the Trolbloods army. CTK and I are going through a campaign that involves 3 of us and we are looking to start this upcoming Tuesday so it has gotten me interested / motivated to start working on the Trollbloods again. We are doing a hex-based campaign called the Warmachine Conquest Campaign and it will be very short but we are just looking for an opportunity to play some games and put the armies to good use. I’ll also be using my blog to give updates each week that we make our moves. The standard format is that the campaign is turn-based and we each have options of fortifying our hexes and generating Resource Points. After 20 rounds, whoever has the most… wins… Pretty simple and straightforward! So here’s a picture of the quickly put-together campaign board:
you must have for my words.
This morning I trekked along the cliffs by Botany Bay with a few good friends – taking in the magnificent scenery, navigating new paths and generating eerie stories with tragic endings to our eventful escapade! There’s something quite magical in getting back in touch with nature, in experiencing a new world and getting inspired by the beautiful world right outside our doors!
E.P. Sanders, ‘The Covenant as a Soteriological Category and the Nature of Salvation in Palestinian and Hellenistic Judaism,’ in Jews, Greeks and Christians: Studies in honour of W.D. Davies, R. Hamerton-Kelly and R.Scroggs, ed. (Leiden:Brill 1976), 11-44.
I had sooooo many things to post about my first couple of nights of class this semester. I had a LOT of frustrations to vent about. THEN, I read my "Best friend that lives far away"'s blog, and realized - "If you don't have anything nice to say...." and decided that, like her, I should ZIP IT.
Its a LOTV stamp called "The Little Things" which I coloured in using my promarkers. I distressed around the edge of the image and as you can see matt and layered, with foundations paper, and another one from my stash. I used a Martha Stewart punch along one edge of my matts, and I thought the pearls just finished it off. (sorry the photo is on its side).
Spinach Lasagna. Years back, when I tasted Sbarro for the first time, I went for their Spaghetti in White Sauce with Meatball. Through the course of time, it was always my choice whenever I dine at Sbarro... and now that I have a food blog, I wanted to go for something different when I dine at a food place for the second or third time just to give it variation.
Three posts in one day? What am I, crazy? Well, yes. But I can't not celebrate National Bundt Day 2011. Mary the Food Librarian's enthusiasm for all things bundt is so infectious that I just had to break out some bundt pans and bake. (Please go check out Mary's blog for 30 straight days of flour, sugar, and sexy bundt curves. She'll be posting a roundup of all the bundts soon!)
This past week has been a bit different, as I've cooked and actually helped care for someone. This person was run into by an SUV. The person driving the SUV was talking on the cellphone and speeding. She didn't see my new friend until he was on her windshield. He could have died, but is now fighting life from a wheelchair.
Spooky Attic architecture kit Beat Donkey Kong at Spooky Attic
It's such a short word and yet using editminion really showed me how often I use the little 2 letter word. The meanings for the word include: expressing motion in a particular direction, expressing a point reached at the end of a range or a point of time, expressing the result of an action, identifying the person being affected, identifying a relationship, indicating a rate of return, indicating that two things are attached, concerning or likely to concern, and much more... Chapters have like 100 or so "to" that I've noticed, which seems too much.
We feel so tired, my heart and I.
Pizza: made with a whole wheat crust, fresh plum tomatoes and basil, and a sprinkle of part skim parmigiana cheese and NOT sausage and greasy pepperoni
This portion of the midterm is worth 30 percent of the midterm grade and will be the last portion of the midterm graded (back to you by Wednesday, February 22).
But in the case of Bob's phony "doctorate", they clearly don't.
Today we celebrated a coworker’s birthday. It’s tradition to have some sort of sweet treat at some point during the day and today was no exception. During our Monday morning all staff meeting we had these giant pastries from one of the best bakeries in the city. I will admit I took one. Not a whole one, really it was just one quarter of one which was still huge. I indulged for a few different reasons. 1. It looked AWESOME, 2. I think it would be unsustainable to miss out on very special occasions, 3. I still have some hang ups about being the odd man out when it comes to food. This is a holdover from living at my parents’ house and have it be a big deal and openly discussed whenever I was on a diet. If I was trying to make any kind of healthy change and I ate something that was “off plan” my parents would say, “Is that on your diet?” “Are you allowed to eat that?” It was incredibly embarrassing and I still am uncomfortable talking about my diet with others.
1/3 cup chopped herbs (any combination of mint, basil, thyme, and/or parsley)
The first person, whose face that I can see clearly as this picture before me develops with further clarity, is the face that belongs to Lisa.
The very best part about it is that we have absolute, complete peace about this decision. We can't even come close to affording it, but there are financial aid and fund raising and volunteer opportunities. And sometimes, the Holy Spirit makes things so very plain that it is easy to know that He will take care of the financial side--and so we're trusting Him to do just that!
Well, today I did the Plyometric Cardio Circuit, and it was INSANE! But I definitely did dig deep which felt great. I even felt very energetic after my workout. The only thing bad about todays workout was my stupid closet door felt the need to squeak while I did the plyometrics. But oh well.
write about a book/movie
I missed posting last night for the first time in 40 days. D’oh! I’m blaming it on the head cold that arrived a couple of days ago. Or the whirlwind road trip to Wichita (a mere 3-hour drive each way) for a family party with my in-laws. Or tacking the Vintage Homes Tour (where all that bread was for sale) on to the end of it.
Thanks. You guys DO know how to go fast on a turnpike and how to get out of my way. Well done. I learned that the car I borrowed from my brother goes 110 with no trouble whatsoever, and it wanted to go faster but I chickened out. Plus I had to pee and saw a rest stop.....
Besides Yunho, Oh is best friends with actor Jung Woo Sung, Lee Jung Jae and Oh Ji Ho. Oh launched a fashion business with Lee Jung Jae and Jung Woo Sung, and started a kimchi company as partners with Oh Ji Ho.
Below:
My main goal for this summer is to, finally, get my drivers license. I have had my permit since October. Me and cars do not mix very well though, so I am hoping to put aside a large chunk of time dedicated to nothing but driving each day. So, look out world, I'm going to be mobile!
A lifetime steeped in this culture has me thinking that I should. And yet, those feelings don’t quite fit. I don’t feel irrelevant, invisible, or particularly in need of fixing… But, on a bad day, the crows feet around my eyes make me think not of all the smiles that made them, but that I should feel badly about my age (and maybe start a Retin-A regimen… or start sleeping upside-down to prevent the sag… oh dear gawd, what if things start to sag??), even while the other half of me calls out those thoughts as bullshit. (I’m a Gemini: the twins. I have lots of conversations with myselves.)
... wool top-hat and rusty pin bowtie.
This public service announcement was brought to you by the verb 'To Be' and the letters P, M and S. Thank you.
Hair salon software is the best example of the advanced technology which is gaining huge popularity among the people running beauty salon. It is a wonderful tool to care your growing business in an organized way and to boost up your overall business. If your business is growing enough then you should have this software. It is for sure that it will handle your business in a professional way.
PNHR’s engagement process is focused on you and your business needs. This consultative approach, known as our Exact Fit Program, details from start to finish how our staffing firm selects the perfect candidate for your organization.
“I was unhappy about the marriage. I told my parents who did not agree with me, then I sought help,” Sargara told AFP.
~Anneke
Pictures get more interesting when their light source is off to one side a little. This makes the shadows more exciting, but it can also get tricky to color.
All I could say is WOW!
58. Bonnie & Clyde (Warren Beatty)
I've never had a hundred of anything; I've never had a hundred dollars, never weighed a hundred pounds (I skipped from 99 right up to 101), never held a hundred girls, never been kissed a hundred times... oh, I've been slapped more than a hundred times, but when you only got a hundred years to live, what's a few slaps?
Liberalism is wrong 100 percent of the time. The only things that liberals are good at is lying and demonizing.
16. Russell was offered the option to turn The Sarah Jane Adventures into a show airing on Sundays at 5.30pm, which would have required reinventing the series. He decided against it.
Do you have a favorite library experience? Several years ago a middle cchool library in Palm Coast, FL hosted a fabulous author talk surrounding my Specialists series. The kids were great, the hostess was wonderful, and the snacks she’d homemade were out of this world.
who stand in the way
The novel’s narrators are from all around the globe, from all walks of life, from US Chief of Staff, to a Chinese online gamer. Some voices appear more than others; there are core of six or seven narrators that form the spine of the novel, but other voices are brought in to add flavour and authenticity to the mix. This idea works well, as it allows Smythe to show different viewpoints of the same events, giving the story a global perspective (though most of the narrators are from the UK and the US).
B2 Golden Lane
I am a follower to all these blogs & they have all in there own way merited this award. Go and give them a look & you will know what I mean!
Our next Labelcrew project is a table runner and I will be making it in these fabrics so I thought a matching tea towel was the way to go.
Raquel is doing well. She has been out all afternoon purchasing food at the market.
being filled up with water
Beifa appealed on various grounds and was successful. The company was correct to say that its request for proof of use of the earlier mark was wrongly refused, but this was not fatal since this ground was raised for the first time only before the General Court. Beifa had more luck when it came to a comparison of the design with the earlier mark: "113 ... it is apparent from the registration certificate for the earlier mark, which was in the case-file in the proceedings before OHIM, that that mark is figurative, consisting in the image reproduced ... above. In the light of that aspect, all the parties agreed at the hearing that the only mark taken into consideration by the various adjudicating bodies within OHIM, when considering the application for a declaration of invalidity, was the earlier mark, which is a figurative mark, a fact which was recorded in the minutes.
Love and fear.
Now, in an effort to raise awareness for another one of the Humane Society's events, The Bark Ball , I've entered my pups in a photo contest - and of course I am shamelessly soliciting you for help!
What I'm finding is that it is becoming harder and harder for me to post on and visit sites like FetLife or spanking boards. I don't feel a part of it. I feel like an outsider or an intruder. I no longer feel like part of the group because I don't have any recent shared history and so I feel awkward talking to my spanking friends because I do feel like an outsider (not that they do anything to make me feel this way). All I have is ancient history and every time I post, I'm recounting some old story that I've probably already told and have nothing new to bring to the table.
The idea of writing this post is to make people across the globe aware of the benefits of energy healing and have a healthy society at all levels.
My impression and feelings about the concert were mixed. The music gave a definitely Yiddish impression. The most interesting were the poems by Rosa Ausländer, set to music in “Das Märchen vorbei”. I may dip into her poetry.
This meal is very popular also in all the Mediterranean countries, and every country has its own special way of cooking it. Today I prepared it stuffed with minced meat, and cooked it with lamb chops.
Bath Salts
Sprinkle the chicken generously with Oregano, Thyme, Garlic Powder, Lemon Pepper and a little Salt.
So my coat hides my tummy a little bit, but you can see that I’m definitely shaped different now than I was a year ago. Thank goodness. Pregnancy is great in many ways, but I was so very uncomfortable this last time. I’m so glad that’s done.
I decided to make my curtains out of burlap. It matches the pillow, and ties it all together. I also love the contrast of it against the blue walls. The fabric on the right will be used as the drapery header.
It is Monday another start to what should be a great week! Although I AM exhausted! After receiving a text a couple weeks ago from one of my favorite cousins ever saying,
Namaste is not only the final words in SF Yoga class.
The overall economy, as measured by the gross domestic product, grew at an annual rate of 5.6 percent in the final three months of last year. About two-thirds of that growth came as companies slowed the reduction of their inventories.
That is the new record for length of tenant lease without an eviction.
First, a little background: I am Canadian. The first half of my childhood was spend on a farm, of sorts. Rural. In the bush. Gumboots and plaid, before plaid was cool. That kind of thing. My family were loggers and our neighbours were ranchers. This being said, I am very familiar with the general culture of both:
And so it goes.
It’s the response to your anxiety that’s
Football with an old can.
Each day is unique and should be a fresh start. This morning’s front page is not yesterday’s. But do we have distinguishable news items, and is it fair to expect and find ameliorations to our daily stories? Yes, it is; and it is also well worth cultivating a discipline of observation. The way to work has only so many variations on the basic route. But in a real sense, just as the day is unique, it is not the same way through the same places. During the lunch hour of noting words in my journal, I chose an old familiar perch. But the day varies context and backdrop. From the second floor window of the coffeehouse, sheltered from the rain, pedestrians’ umbrellas appeared as twirling spoked mushroom caps. Varying my vantage point permits perception practice. The street below revealed textures I hadn’t noticed at ground level. Looking north between office buildings, I recognized a steeple four neighborhoods away, standing at the horizon.
“But you wouldn’t have learned anything.”
Yet instead of being sacked for gross disloyalty, he was promoted. Can you imagine any successful company that would behave in such a pathetic manner towards a senior member of staff making money out of trashing the firm’s reputation?
Hello peeps,
When big-city life threatens the safety of one oftheir children, Brad and Darlene Henderson move with their three teenagers fromHouston to the tiny town of Round Top, Texas.
Yeongwonhan sarmeul irheotdaedo haengbokhan iyu
Put it in your pocket,
Again to my additional surprise, both girls began to own their own heinous behavior and they actually grasped the concepts we were trying to share with them (albeit, my niece tried valiantly to deflect as much responsibility as possible, her friend would not let her get away with it) and while I don't think either girl will abandon their myspace, facebook and formspring pages, nor their phones, I feel that they were given food for thought.
Freddie would just shake his head.
But Paris, he murmurs,
The whole film employs this technique. He just slams you in yo face from one side to the other
So I had passed my driving test 3 months previously, was 3 months pregnant with Holly and life was good.
In a way, though, the ambiguity and individual nature of an FKT is a self-protecting part of the concept that keeps it from, hopefully, becoming too fraught with the egos and hype that can surround racing. The term itself--fastest known time--is a way of hedging one's bets; we think this is the current best possible performance on this route, but of course, we don't really know as everyone sort of does their own thing, maybe there has been a faster unknown performance, etc., etc. Placing one's athletic worth on the foundation of an FKT is inadvisable at best, most likely silly, and delusional at worst. Such ambiguity should be a healthy reminder to focus on the experience and process of simply moving quickly and efficiently in nature--embodying that most primal of activities--and not worrying unduly about the end-goal result.
We did yoga and meditation upon rising, beach boot camps, self development sessions and running in the late afternoon. My initial intentions when I signed up for this was mainly to exercise while away on vacation. Who says we have to choose between vacationing and exercising right? And as always, Eva did not disappoint.
Thus nine days pujai and it marks nine nights which is Navrathiri.The tenth day being Dasami is celebrated as Vijaya Dasami.
Healthy Mix concealer is £7.49 so about half the price as my previous Benefit ones – plus I paid for it and the Barry M product with Advantage Card points, so I didn’t think of it as spending money!
In Genesis we read the account of the devil who appeared in the form of a serpent. He convinced Eve she did not need to obey God. In fact, he told her that if she obeyed him, she would be like God and would know good from evil (Genesis 3:1-5.)
I'll be back Sunday night, but will try to blog any worthy goofy happenings while I am there.
We definitely covered a lot of ground in our short trip! It was so nice to get away with my girlfriends and just enjoy getting to spend time together.
The Red Sox are on fire. Their players are on fire. Mike Aviles, the leadoff hitter has 5 home runs. David Ortiz is hitting .405 with 6 hrs and 20 RBI. Ruined against the Yankees, the bullpen had an ERA of 1.06 in the last week. A combination of their 127 runs (most in the MLB), their .281 batting average (2nd), their .474 slugging percentage (2nd), and their improved bullpen, makes them unstoppable for now, at least. As they keep looking to stay over .500 for the rest of the year, this combo will hopefully propel them to the top of baseball.
I love the fine crumb texture of this cake and the fact that I can smell it from a mile away when I was baking it. Instead of the traditional pound cake mould, I had deliberately chosen to bake it in a slim rectangular baking tin so that I can cut them up in tiny slices to be nibbled on like a snack - a perfect presentation for the upcoming Chinese New Year where treats are best served in small finger food sizes. If you find the Kueh Lapis too challenging and time consuming to make for the coming festival, I suggest you consider this recipe as it is easy to whip up and is ... as the name claims, Plainly Perfect!
“I’m Dr. Benson,” he announced to the couple as they walked down the hall. “Your daughter is resting now. There isn’t much more we can do other than keep her under observation. We can’t let her sleep for a while, of course.”
My tarragon has sprouted new leaves! I'm so relieved! Let's just hope that it will grow healthy, keeping my fingers crossed. The ones which I propagate from the cuttings doesn't look good. There's no sign of any new leaves, they just look like dead twigs, and I dare not touch them as I'm afraid that I might disturb the new roots, if there are any! Will wait for another week and see. I have not sowed the seeds yet! Hope to do that these few days as I'm extremely busy with household duties after back from the holidays.
While away, Leland met Pamela Churchill and left Slim to
1tsp vanilla essence
"Ach, Michael." Will groaned. "Hush, for once in your life. The girls did grow up in the same house. You recognize that, right?"
Pendragon: Three week ban.
One of the mottos that I always say is that: It is my goal to be wise and not deep. Wisdom was not standing out a few times because I was always rushing going somewhere else or attending another event and shelters were on the way. So now, there is a schedule that entails what im bringing, where im taking it to and when im going. It is all about having an efficient process!
This guy is not currently in my line-up of “Must Meets”. I’m tired of being told, “you’re too picky, lower your expectations” or “just date around, you never know”. If I had a quarter for every time someone threw me one of those god-for-saken cliché’s I could retire AND buy real estate in the UAE.
was that I needed
2 bananas (about 200g peeled weight), peeled and mashed.
Food: I did a little more research on farmers markets in the area. Like I said before, all of the ones in Houston are in the center of Houston (and Houston is a massive sprawling city much larger than LA or New York). HOWEVER, I found one in Tomball. Tomball is a small town outside of Houston and I guess I just never thought to Google "Tomball Farmers Market"...It is less than 10 miles from my house! I will be checking it out this weekend.
It is the story of a mother, who puts her intelligent young son to work in a dhaba, so that she can repay loans and take care of the young daughter.
MINUSES - The card number at the bottom is a big pet peeve of mine. It makes box collation very difficult. The free-standing front logo seems odd as well, perhaps a small box, circle or wedge would have improved it.
Bishop’s Farewell, Oakham Ales
There are two types of people: 1. Those who make lists; 2. Those who don't. The way I see it, people with lists often get stressed. Obsessive even. I base this on reliable research aka I once made lists but that ended a long time ago. Why? I went nuts. Well guess what? PVR makes lists for me. For a while I had 7 episodes of Top Chef. What's a guy to do? I can't handle that sort of stress. I CAN'T. So I watched them. All. Of. Them. Until my eyes fell out.
Of course I have not cleared it with Queen Abby yet......my rat terrier who basically dictates the goings on around here. She does not think she is a dog. She hates squirrels. She thinks cats are just squirrels without fuzzy tails. She does not like other dogs......so it could be interesting.
As we prepare for the hectic schedule of the holiday season, please remember to take a few quiet moments and share a cup of cheer with a special friend or family member.
I can't remember the last time, outside of school, when I had to take a test, or even answer one question, where I didn't have time to or wasn't allowed to consult someone else or some technology to help me figure out the answers. So why do we force our children to perform this way on a weekly basis for over a decade of their lives?
The kids, the pet frog
PS4info dreams of a next-gen PlayStation with a 32nm Cell processor an up to 16 SPEs, double the number in the PlayStation 3. While over on gamrConnect, there’s talk of a greater partnership with Google. Sony’s new fondness for Android on the Xperia Play is an interesting strategy.
I started scouting about a week before my season started. Around here, there are a lot of birds in agricultural fields that border woods. I work on public lands, though, so I wanted to hunt in one of the areas where we’ve worked to improve turkey habitat. It’s a prettier spot, but also more challenging because they don’t necessarily follow the rigid patterns that develop in farmlands where they have consistent food sources and less danger from predators.
I slept past noon. aha. I woke up took a shower , ate and tried to find service with not much luck. After that I went on the computer for a bit. Liz came back we talked some and went to take her brother to his guitar lesson. After that liz showed me where she does her school stuff. We went to the store to kill time then went to church which was fun. Her friends are crazy. They had food after the service which was nice. It was good . Came back home.I was glad to see some sunshine today. It has rained past few days as per usual here.The sunshine made me smile. I was hoping to call my dad today but unfortunately phone service is sketchy . Hopefully tomorrow So that is what has happened on my trip so far!
The value of an opinion depends on the extent to which a person has striven to become informed before forming an opinion – and that is an ever evolving process. The problem is that most of the world are constantly forming opinions based on hearsay and a little personal reflection, then proceed to overestimate their ignorance. I would rather value the man who says, ‘I don’t know’, and gives his soul to finding out – and the very few men who have come back with a treasure. The others only indulge in their own vanity. The idea spread the world over that ‘your truth is different to mine’ is the result of a postmodern disease that started as academic theory but has now captured civilizations – and they don’t even realize where that idea began or how they have become victim to it. That is the extent of their ignorance, but you hardly meet a man who says he doesn’t know.
Martha
Internet users who saw the photo commented, “You guys are too sweet”, “Your chin line is like your mother,” and “She has nice skin also.”
Looked Askance at Husband. Just as he was looking at me, in the same sort of way.
Then lunchtime came. My sister-in-law asked, “What is the plan for lunch?” My heart dropped. If only my husband was here and could say something to clear up the confusion. But he wasn’t. So I gathered my panicked thoughts and explained that we were in a difficult season. “Don’t worry,” she said. “Let’s look in your pantry. I’m sure we can find something that will work.”
As a post script, I never bought the dress (more down to fit than pattern). The salesperson did try her best to convince me; she even brought me a pair of shoes to compliment the outfit. She went with the classic choice – the Manolos, and so then did I.
After dropping my son and two friends off at school this sunny Wednesday in Northern California, I came home to find our 3 of the cats waiting for breakfast at the back door. We now have 5 outdoor cats, 2 are visiting from my daughter’s place.
Turlo stopped and looked up at the walls again; they were almost on us, peeking out from the thick smoke of the YBR's locomotive. He looked back at his brothers and waved them off. A moment later they lifted off and caught the updraft. "You know where to find us. We're a scant mile or so away. We'll be ready." He stared at me like it would be our last meeting, but I wasn't worried. He'd been too much a part of this play to go missing before the final act.
ruining America and blah blah blah. And despite the fact that I did not argue, that I did not really comment, and all I did was to say that I really have no interest in politics and couldn't tell you one candidate from the other, she K E P T G O I N G. The woman who is about as close to the stereotypical Susie-Homemaker happy sunshine and smiles mother housewife got in my face and raised her voice at me because I did not leap up
U-Unique- What is your strangest food combination? plain raw pickles dipped in ranch dressing with saltine crackers (it's a tradition my friend at work and I do almost every Friday)
So disappointing.
So if content changes on Site A, it is pushed out to all Facebook members who have connected their Site A experience to their Facebook experience, and will show up in their Facebook timeline, and in their friends’ timelines.
To give birth to a child that you could never call your own.
We've started a new little tradition for birthdays. I buy a number-shaped sparkler for each of them as their birthday approaches. At the time of their birth - around 6.40pm for O - we head outside and light the sparkler. We sing happy birthday. They just love it.
My inspiration this time came from the Halloween collection of one of my collectors. Her paper/paper mache lanterns really "spoke" to me and set my brain whirling. Although my inspiration is from the old (and yes, I'm often inspired by old Halloween imagery) I always like to put my own "spin" or "twist" on things.
He would leave it as a forgotten history.
Ever look at certain couples and wonder how on earth they ever ended up together? Maybe you can’t believe your own luck after pulling above your weight?
Imagine my shock and dismay when I received in the mail today a tri-fold flyer touting the latest “alumni advantages” and upon opening it, I spied an article inviting me to a launch party for “Devil’s Pitchfork Pale Ale” at Four Peaks Brewery (find the link to their brewery yourself).
As always on this anniversary day, I took Katie to visit his grave. Jill is buried in the same cemetery, but they aren't next to each other. Had we known that we'd be burying Jill just 3 years later, she could have reserved the adjacent plot, but you don't think of things like that at the time.
So I’ll leave you with these gems:
What the anvil? what dread grasp
Furthermore, it shouldn't cease after an initial "here's what's in the box and here's how you can use it" session. It should continue and evolve as teacher needs change, familiarity increases and confidence waxes and wanes. I believe that much of the success seen in Chicago's iPad program is due to the supportive and responsive nature of the monthly PD embedded in its pilot - before and during the integration of these devices. Perhaps teachers like Ms. Rosenbaum (cited in the article) would start spending their evenings creating ePubs instead of writing protest letters if they had better modeling, training and access to quality digital content.
Oh yeah, and one more thing: Don’t make me share a desk with Edwin on second shift.
Use as the subject line: Children’s and Youth Call
In my experience, this is the most common sort. The SBND are those who are attracted to spiritual things but hate the idea of someone telling them what to do. These are the folks who like to make it up as they go along—then change it all (or drop it all together) on a monthly basis. Thus, the “spiritual” part affirms that they think spiritual things are good; the “not religious” part affirms that neither a community or tradition can have authority over what they want to do and when they want to do it.
One is my friend Leila, across the continents, who understands and labels emotions beautifully, and helps me sort my feelings out of the way, leaving me with knowledge. She helps in making me calm and joyful and I feel safe in her devotion to Indra.
German bakeries are everywhere. I thought we were more famous for the sausage, but no.
“‘I was just looking at the improvements you’ve made here,’ Mr.Vaux volunteered in explanation, and after a word or two more walked to the shore. Some persons saw him walking back. This was the last seen of him alive. The family suspected that he had taken a car for the city, and had been overcome on the road and possibly taken to some hospital. They were much worried and when he did not return yesterday afternoon they notified the police of Bath Beach. A general alarm was then sent out.”
During this trial, I have concluded that the prosecutors made their case. I will vote to remove President Clinton from office not only because he is guilty of both articles of impeachment, but also because I believe the crimes committed here demonstrate that he is capable of lying routinely whenever it is convenient. He is not trustworthy. Simply to be near him in the White House has meant not only tragic heartache for his wife and his daughter but enormous legal bills for staff members and friends who admired him and yearned for his success but who have been caught up in his incessant `war room' strategies to maintain him in office. Senator Feinstein begins her censure resolution with the appropriate word `shameless.' The President should have simply resigned and spared his country the ordeal of this impeachment trial and its aftermath.
Solution: water less. Ideally I want the paper to be saturated but not overly so.
Since seeing Brian’s post about asking students this question, I’ve been thinking about how my students might answer. In one section of Honors Physics, we’re just wrapping up a second look at momentum and energy transfer (mainly using problems that involve a transition between using both in the same analysis). My Honors kids have written answers on scraps of paper to questions from my “Internet friends” before, so they were ready for another round (they also enjoy signing their responses with their classmates names and the reading of the answers that I do when they’ve all been collected—the voices in the class are pretty unique, so they usually know who has written which response anyway).
My favourite characters were the Bluebird and his princess, whose dancing suited each other, and blue is my favourite colour.
Brownsville girl with your Brownsville curls
i watched the video, i felt sorry for the people there, but mostly, i admire the founder of invisiblechildren.org ni. i find him very passionate and consistent with his goal: to capture Joseph K. (amboi glamour dah nama. ahak!)
Let raise 30-40 minutes.
Onward Eco-Soldier!
I would like to show you some of the main points regarding what is expected for a paralegal who would like to join a commercial real estate practice. The good news is that the life of a real estate deal on the residential and commercial sides are not too different. The bad news is that commercial real estate properties are very different from residential properties with regard to assessing value and, as a result, the commercial real estate deals are more complex and time and labor consuming. In both cases, you will see documents that appear similar, are named similar, smell similar, but the commercial property types have one major component that the residential property is missing. It is the continuance and stability of the income stream from the property. As a result, you need to know, learn to recognize and overcome many major obstacles in this type of deal.
He has heard the site is to be turned into a park for kids; a fitting legacy given the losses they bore. That is not the only compensation for residents who awoke on May 2 last year to news they had played unwitting hosts for more than five years to the world’s most wanted terrorist. A deep water bore under the property has provided free water to locals since a pipe was ruptured during demolition. For now, the site remains littered with rubble, although that is diminishing as the army clears the plot and residents souvenir their own bits of genuine bin Laden rubble for posterity.
This cosmic school
Buying a Bounty Hunter Metal Detector – The Best Places to Purchase Your Set
I've been recording a show at Mum's, something on National Geographic about Doomsday Preppers. More on that some other time - I only mention it here so you have some idea why prepping has been on my mind of late.
From what I’ve seen and read you are feeling “queen of the center of attention”. It seems very much you’re trying to stay there mainly by talking bad about your sisters, a fake marriage, a made up beauty and the attempt to “design” clothes with the work of other people.
And time moves on.
To traditional survivalists this involves having a backpack ready and when the time comes you simply strap it on and “get out of dodge”. Usually there is some sort of plan or destination associated with the Bug Out strategy – though in some cases the plan is simply “I got me a gun. Anythin’ I need I can get with the gun.”
last month i finally figured out why a certain issue was causing me much pain in my life. it felt like someone had pulled the scales from my eyes. friend, for nearly 6 months this issue was a source of much grief in my life and i couldnt understand why till last month. looking back, i am beginning to think that maybe God allowed the scales to drop when he knew i was ready to face and deal with the real reason why i was hurting. do you know what mattered the most to me? that i had a friend that stuck through my craziness patiently hearing me talk about the same thing over and over again until i finally joined the dots and figured out the real reason why i hurt.
I just don’t understand why we penalize those who seek to uphold our rule of law. My wife and family are very frustrated. I am writing to let someone who I believe cares about our country know about our frustration.
2010 has been a great year, but I'm definitely ready to take some steps forward and just 'refresh'. I can't wait to see what 2011 has in store for me. I'm incredibly blessed to have my friends and family by my side. I usually don't make New Year's Resolutions, but I've made a list of things I definitely want to accomplish in 2011.
If that really happened IRL, I will be shocked and my jaw will drop to the depths of hell. Is it really humanely possible for girls to try to seduce their step-brother and doing all kinds of ecchi things possible? It is already hard enough to get a girl to go out with you (not speaking from experience seeing I have none) but to end up doing those stuff? No offence, but if you think that this is possible, enjoy Forever Alone Day everyday.
Are leering faces,
If you have all the above qualifications, make sure that:
That is not to say Mausam is completely awful – not only does it boast of an amazing soundtrack but the cinematography is fantastic as is the start of the film which is based in Punjab – in fact, that portion sets up a template that the rest of the film could have and should have followed. Furthermore, there are some wonderful moments of comedy, romance and emotion which if the script had been stronger, would have bolstered the film up but instead, these are more by accident than by design. Styling wise, I loved Shahid’s Punjabi-esque look of cable knit tanks/sweaters over long kurtas and slim jeans teamed with Punjabi jootis (not least because that is my outfit of choice for Lodhi and any autumn/winter event I can wear it too) whilst Sonam’s pistachio coloured sari and black ballet dress with braiding at the front also caught my eye too.
the one who would make me happier. who could provide. the more mature one.
we went running (wherein I huffed and puffed along as Stott patiently slowed down her pace for me), played dancing video games, ate good food, and obviously went shopping. At Winners. That store is AMAZING.
Why does Russell have "real" in quotation marks, followed by information that says the Seminoles are descendants of displaced tribes? She is also collapsing a lot of history into a too-small period, and then she says her family and the Indians of the area are all the same. That's unsettling! It is a bold attack on the sovereignty of the tribes who were there!
Timestamp: 2012-05-01 20:17:27 UTC
The week before that, I wore entirely different earrings to work. One diamond stud, one multi-colored heart. Again, I didn't notice until the afternoon, reaching up to adjust the earring backs. I was wondering why people were smiling at me all day. Thought maybe I was looking really pretty.
On a Sunday. (I know, right? What the....?)
Which I am forbidden to see. I do not find
The flight went well. There was a lot of turbulence and I hate flying, combined with being homesick led to some tears and me begging the Lord to just get me home safe and get this plane landed. After we landed and exited the plane Ben looked at me and says....Did you really cry!??? He's lucky I love him.....what a snot!
It was so easy, in fact, that I anticipated the real work would begin with the second letter. And of course, I knew there HAD to be a second letter. You see, I went through a very rigorous graduate program in which I had to write twelve drafts of my dissertation proposal, before I could even start my dissertation itself. Twelve drafts, some of which were accompanied by revision letters filled with very harsh words about my writing, that might have (more than once) included “sloppy.” So how could a professional editor at a publishing house be happy with one revision?
Deadline:
With a series of exciting roller coasters and water rides based on comic book characters and movies at Islands of Adventure, Universal became a serious player on the Orlando amusement park landscape.
Why Heartland? And how did the “leaker” get his hands on authentic Heartland board materials that are obviously the source for the faked strategy memo? The Heartland Institute sponsors the most significant annual gathering of climate skeptics, usually in New York, Chicago, or Washington, D.C.—a conference that attracts hundreds of scientists and activists from around the globe, including most of the top skeptical scientists, such as MIT’s Richard Lindzen, Yale’s Robert Mendelsohn, and career EPA official Alan Carlin. By assembling a critical mass of serious dissenting opinion, the Heartland conference dispels the favorite climate campaign talking point that there’s virtually no one of repute, and no arguments of merit, outside the -so-called consensus of imminent climate catastrophe.
Here are some suggestions to help prevent injury to yourself and prevent fire at your house (don’t want to have a claim on your homeowners’ policy right before the holidays!):
At the northern end of the Rue Blanche is a dark, thoroughly gothic townhouse. It is rare to see such townhouses in Paris, but this one also sports a rather curious plaque. This is not a standard blue plaque, but is instead a message chiselled into the building itself as if it were a tombstone. This building is the Hôtel Ballu, which was designed and built by Théodore Ballu and which became his home. It seems unusual therefore that the plaque celebrates his death and not his life in this house, but a brief study of the Mr Ballu’s career gives an indication as to why this should not be a surprise.
However as Christians, we must learn to trust God. We must realize that we won’t always get our way or get what we want but; if we are following the path God has paved for our lives – it’s a good thing. God‘s wisdom surpasses all others. If we want the abundant life, we must follow Him even when we don’t understand … even when we don’t like it.
capture your smile in my heart;
Purple jersey cardigan: Coldwater Creek
Converting just the book-words to the most basic digital format is extremely easy. Look, I can do it now. Take that first sentence: 'Let's start from the very beginning'. I won't do all of it, but here's how it goes:
As we enter the season of Lent, according to Joel 2:12
Have I mentioned lately how crazy our lives have become now that both my husband and I work from home with a very vocal toddler beneath our feet? Yes, you're right... I have... repeatedly! Sorry. Some days I feel like my brain might actually burn out, that it will start billowing smoke and simply shut down. I'm developing a Jeckyl & Hyde personality disorder - Mama for two minutes, Designer for one. But every day I discover new things about myself... like I can simultaneously blog and mash banana, all while playing peek-a-boo with a stuffed rhino! It is a crazy, chaotic and wonderful life filled with precious moments tucked into the folds of the mayhem. I am so blessed to spend my days sitting across the studio from the man I love with our beautiful boy quietly chewing carpet samples in the corner. Life doesn't get much better than this... except maybe when my boys bring me flowers!
felt my own disgrace
"Once this ride was great dark ride, called "the Spelunker's Cave". It was a fascinating, mystical water ride filled with animated elflings, that started from a tropical cave's mouth and ended in an alpine snow flurry. Then along came Bugs Bunny. The original ride was destroyed in order to make a corporate franchise ride. It's pretty darn awful too--it does Bugs no favors."
Almost from the moment he meets her, Mr Darcy begins falling for Elizabeth, but she thinks that he is stuck up and rude. Eliza meets the enigmatic Mr Wickham, and he quickly tells her a tale of woe about when was taken in as a child by Mr Darcy’s family when his own father died. He was cared for and he explains that Mr Darcy’s father had intended him for a career in the church. But then the father died and when the chance of that living fell vacant Mr Darcy flat-out refused to give it to Wickham and turned him out. Elizabeth is outraged and her hatred of Mr Darcy grows. But all the while her anger grows he is secretly falling more and more and love with her.
And guess what! She had.
A Galaxy Research poll, released 16 August, found that 53% of Australians who identify as Christians support same-sex marriage, while 41% oppose. 67% of non-Christians support it.
PROVERBS 19:23
recreate an egg-hunt on our family room floor.
I am still going to acupuncture and having great results. We discussed the benefits of doing a gluten free diet. I think that might drive me crazy. Because, pancakes and noodles and sushi and chocolate and vodka? Well....they are pretty important if you ask me.
This is a pretty good foam cleanser as I find it quite gentle on my skin, cleansing properly but not stripping my skin of moisture. Often, cleansers that promise to remove excess sebum tend to be a bit more harsh and end up drying out the skin, but Dove knows a thing or two about moisturising and this self-foaming cleanser did not disappoint. My face feels fresh and clean after using this, with no feelings of tightness. I believe the balance of having the orange oils and hydrating lotion that Dove is known for has created a great basic cleansing product.
J.L. Comeau – Taking Care of Michael
Some overcoming… some … not. Their Faith in the God who never leaves us or forsakes us…. held in the highest utmost position in their lives. Never wavering or denying that One True God they knew and Loved…even unto death.
Sarkunam’s untitled rom-com
If there’s a twinge of pain in the book, it’s the spectacle of the collateral damage. There’s over-bred Ralph Marvell, the scion of Old New York, a refined intellectual who is incapable of earning a living. Beautiful brassy Undine dazzles him and he makes the mistake of seeing in her a sensibility that meets his own. The match ends, of course, in tears, and Undine uses their son Paul as leverage to get a divorce so that she can marry up — into the French aristocracy.
Some of those dreams get changed by reality, when you start a new relationship, when you buy your first house, when you enter a new career. I know that having a family sometimes means that your own dreams go on hold for a time. But maybe that just means it’s time to reframe your aspirations to fit the context. Some of those dreams stick with you though. They’re so strongly rooted that nothing can shake them off. The heart and mind yearn for those aspirations.
My favourite tracks are “Sliver”, “Where Did You Sleep Last Night”, “Rape me”, “Lithium”, “Dumb” and “Come as you are”.
Chock full of imperfect people behaving badly, Practice Cake, A Romantic Comedy, is light-hearted and brimming with humor.
During each QVC Show, The Fairy Godmother presides over a magical destination. These shows are beautifully elaborate productions with settings and costumes that bring the Kirks Folly fantasy themes to life.
Well yesterday morning was one of those mornings that follow a fairly sleepless night. I was exhausted and had scheduled to move furniture with my Hubby for the better part of the day. I groaned to Brent that I really wanted some coffee.
So many people from all over the country were there. Many of them had traveled alone. We met a woman from Seattle and a man from Dallas. There was a couple from Maryland that had a goal of doing a race in every state. So far they were 4 states in.
I've never actually made gingerbread cookies, men or houses. I celebrate Hanukkah so I'm usually stuffing my face with potato goodies and jelly donuts instead of cookies. I love gingerbread cookies so here we go! Feel free to make any version of these that you want, be it a gingerbread man, woman, house or city. Go crazy! If you have a deep dislike for gingerbread cookies, feel free to choose another type of cookies that suits your taste.
Plus: Iran will move into Iraq now that America has left.... News about the Beringians.... Geloftedag, the Day of the Vow, celebrated.... Government waste goes back to ancient Roman times... Solutrean update.... your phone calls at 718.761.9996 and more!
Two years later I was able to increase my hours to 36. Not without yet another flutter of anxiety. It is the sheer variety of my job that keeps me where I am. No day is ever the same with many challenges.
George and I behaved like proper tourists and got a 2 day bus pass for the Red and Blue City busses that took us to different places. It is a hop on, hop off set up and the bus is never late, and it doesn’t wait for you. It is the most efficient system I have ever seen and so well co-ordinated. the red bus takes you through the city, the blue bus on the outskirts. It was so awesome. Check out for the information on the busses: http://www.citysightseeing.co.za/
“Homework: Compose a poem about my defeat of the Wagga Wagga Werewolf! Signed copies of Magical Me to the author of the best one!”
On Sunday afternoon when we're sitting around the house after church I put the whole chicken in a stock pot filled halfway up with water. I salt and pepper the water and let it boil for an hour and a half. When it finishes boiling, I take the chicken out of the pot, set it on a plate and let it cool. I also let the stock cool.
You can read more about this project on the Design Memory Craft blog. I love Gelatos so much and working on wood is fun and a whole different surface to alter... I'm looking for my next fix!
Boys are funny creatures, on the surface they can be hard to figure out, but if you take a step back and just take the time to watch them and hear them you will learn so much.
1. The case contains an interesting analysis of how the laws of trade mark infringement and passing off are applied in Kenya as well as their Court procedure. Unsurprisingly, some reference is made to English law;
Last year as time was ticking away, I happened to go and watch Megamind and it made my top ten list of 2010 from the sheer awesomeness of it. Sitting down to watch Kung Fu Panda 2 I wondered if this would follow suit and Dreamworks would rock my world more than Pixar. So did this Panda give me the five finger punch of death, or was it more white belt in its Kung Fu ways?
In Australia, it’s called tall poppy syndrome, where the highest flower, swaying happily in the summer sun, gets its gorgeous little head lopped off for — being the most visible. In Japan, they hammer down the tallest nail.
told her to, so for years she lied to and manipulated everyone she
Pabst Blue Ribbon; Milwaukee, Wisconsin, Pale Lager, 5% abv
He climbed the millions of stairs to the top.
Today's Shout Outs:
Notable weight gain: 6 pounds from my normal weight! Dr. says I'm right on track :-)
Through a glass darkly, I see possibilities:
Problem solved!
“No, I don’t,” Pearl said. She was looking straight up with her eyes open. Anna, already falling asleep, couldn’t see the tears. “If things hadn’t happened exactly the way they did,” she said, “I wouldn’t have been here with you.”
To tell you the truth, I’m not entirely convinced I’ve grown into a better person since that incident in grade two. I still gossip, I still stab people in the back, I still betray confidences. And though I hate myself for it, I’ve always found it easier to rip others apart than face this reality: I don’t have anything interesting or compelling to contribute to social interactions. In other words, gossip spews from a place of fear and insecurity, not interest and belief. I know, in theory, what I’m doing is wrong. But if it diverts attention away from my inferiority—gets me outta the hot seat—for even a brief period of time, then, for the most part, it’s the action I’m prepared to take. Which makes me a coward. Which makes me a bully. Which makes me a loser. Which makes me ashamed.
This is it. We’ve come from DC to LA. Our final day together was fun and while in the past I’ve essentially given a laundry list of the things we did I don’t feel like that’s appropriate for the final post. The three of us came a long way and the few things we did around the city pale in comparison to what we experienced on the road. In a sense our arrival was an anticlimax. We arrived in LA with no agenda, no destination, no idea what to do. I was left wanting more.
Just a little nugget from this week – During the Revolutionary War, Thursday April 26, 1777 was the day that Sybil Ludington rode all night on horseback to warn local troops that the British were attacking. Her father was a colonel in the militia and she was barely sixteen, but she rode all night covering roughly 40 miles. She accomplished her mission and the men gathered together the next morning to fight. Paul Revere covered less distance and was memorialized in a poem, but Sybil was just a girl helping out her dad.
I came across this article while browsing through one of my favorite toddler activity sites, http://www.clever-toddler-activities.com/, and I just had to share it! In all my research (and believe me…I’m an information junkie!), I had never heard of “EFT” (Emotional Freedom Technique) before. I’m not sure I’m a true believer yet, but if this super-simple ritual actually helps even a little bit, it could have amazing implications for the emotional health and stability of your entire family! I, for one, am eager to read more on this subject…..anything that helps de-escalate temper tantrums, and brings a few moments of zen into our house, has my seal of approval!
Toss and dig in.
Goodmorning everyone,
Then the nurse put an IV in my hand and hooked me up to the monitors. I handed her my birth plan, told her that my OB told me to make one. She glanced at it and then put it into a folder, which no one opened after that.
March 18th 2009 was the first day of the rest of my life!
I wish I had my camera cord here so I could just post pictures to give you a visual journey of my day yesterday as it was one of the most visually stunning hikes I have taken in my entire life (running very close in line with Tiger Leaping Gorge in China which, if you visit China and miss this, you are missing out on one of the most spectacular experiences in the universe). Alas, the electronic device that brings what I saw to you all is stashed away in my Container Store shelves in NYC. For now, my words will have to do.
Aer Lingus (Dublin) has a new partner. Etihad Airways (Abu Dhabi), still on its spending spree, has acquired a 2.987 percent share of the Irish flag carrier. Aer Lingus has issued the following statement:
This will be Lime Trees last sale for two months. I'm having a bit of a break and a holiday with my family. We'll be back in October with some scrummy new goodies.
You gotta wonder sometimes. Amidst all the contradictions and the mystery, yeah. You do.
A good shepherd lays down his life for the sheep.
My Snow Patrol pics : )
I opened the basket and saw this:
here's another! All comforts close to hand for settling down for a time to enjoy the gorgeous views, or if you can resist the views, curling up on the sofa with the quilt and a good book for a quiet read or indulging in an al-fresco snooze!
One thing is for sure, Google hasn’t had a great 2012. It started out with the paid links controversy surrounding a Google Chrome ad campaign. Google ended up penalizing the Google Chrome page and demoting it in the search results. Next came the whole Search Plus debacle and now this.
The hostel was so beautiful, new, clean and even heated floors to top it off! Moose provided us with a great BBQ and then went off for a night out in Whistler Village. We had an awesome time dancing the night away!
S: Rollercoaster—I like the actual kind while my character Chloe is on the emotional kind.
Her: Really?
I have made a Slide Show for you, sit back now and relax and watch your Blanket whizz round!
Traditionally this €25,000 wedge was split 50:50 between the initial landowner and her builder purchaser so that, at a density of ten dwellings per acre, such greenfield land could reasonably be said to be worth perhaps €125,000 per acre or about four times average earnings.
Vinyl products like vinyl picket fences and privacy fences are designed mainly for outdoor purposes. Vinyl picket fences are used in homes as domestic boundaries for confining children and pets to a limited area. These fences transform the appearance of the home and bestow a new look. They are good alternatives to wood picket and rails.
Ms. Cruz and her husband, Warren, established the foundation in his name to ensure his memory would not be forgotten. Each year, it awards college-bound Wall students that have a love of soccer with scholarships to use to aid in their higher education.
This time, I was bent upon finishing all the baking, decorating and shopping a day before R's big day. I couldn't afford to miss on anything and then have a panic attack at the last minute. I have had enough of those and I'm not up for any more of it ;-) So 2 days before their big day, we both sat down and sorted out all what we bought. I was telling Jobin that I love doing such stuffs and that it reminded me of my birthday parties Appan & Amma used to host when I was a kid. I remember fighting to get a 'carry home' gift for myself.
Some definitions of the word strike:
It was quite a whirlwind of a trip that was completely fabulous and filled with so many special moments. NYC is a place I have talked about going for years and I am just thrilled it became a reality. I have no idea when my next trip there will be, but I can assure you there will be one. I'm already planning my must see list for round two. Another Broadway show, the Empire State building, Lady Liberty and Ellis Island up close, the MOMA or Metropolitan Museum. I hope the next trip is a little longer. I want to be able to take my time, to really be able to soak up the unique vibe of this city.
It wasn’t even a covert breeze that came along, blustering away everything I KNEW to be true. It was a brazen and malevolent heist of joy that had just been sown in me at Bible study. I can recognize it for what it is in hindsight, but how better off I’d have been to have known it in the moment. I definitely would not have responded back with the same hatred that I was being impaled with.
The Lower Classes
JESUS CHRIST.
I didn't do it myself.
Roy Yokley
Chopper: Jimmy, if you keep stabbing me, you're going to kill me.
At the end, as always, aim for it, enjoy the process and don’t forget to have a little faith.
I have so many things to do. An hour to be out the door with 4 of our 6 kids for an appointment. Everyone is still in PJ's working on school projects...worship playing in the back ground... I just had to stop and share with someone how great God is! Since phone conversations are next to impossible for me these days...I am telling anyone who will take time to read this.
I think many people know aboutSuzhou, what you do not know is inSuzhou, any one over the age of 60 get free buss ride, any student will ride for free.. For RMB$1 and at maximum RMY 2, you travel a distance from Jurong to Changi point, about 2 hours journey. Their diesel is at the same price as ours. I though we taughtSuzhou? As for Shen Zhen orBeijing, for RMY2, you travel for at least 1 hour. All are air con buses. Forget about allChinacitizens above 65 yrs get 55 RMY per month, small sum right, but no string attached.
If you want to know when the blog starts back up, email me at
Asked for comment, Choidon Daikaku said, “Fulford-san must embrace the life of JUDO, and then fat white boy heal properly!”
My profile of the Byron-Clayton family in Nottingham and London, prior to Joseph's emigration to New York, is supplemented with a gallery containing numerous examples of their portrait work.
No matter the convenience of modern technology, if all that we value is kept in tiny soulless devices then the future of humanity is indeed bleak. If all that we can look forward to is endless convenience and the gradual erosion of beauty then we have little to view that is positive save convenience. We enter the world of Blade Runner.
Simply sit on your bike and pedal around. You should keep your arms slightly bent. You should also adjust your seat height so your leg is 70 to 90 percent extended at the bottom of every stroke on the pedal. Keep your body relaxed, as there will never be a position where you should have either your knees or your elbows locked.
A woman in the audience expressed dismay that Obama was "operating outside the Constitution," then said Obama should be tried for treason for violating separation of powers.
People crashed the Jack Parow band on stage… like a photo-bomb, but on the large scale. They were thrown off by security to Boo’s from the crowd. (at the security for killing the gees, not at the stage crasher)
I do not want to have dinner or sex with a famous politician.
I know you are all thinking I'm crazy right now, but I am living proof that this works. I have NEVER felt better in my life. I love that I rarely get sick, I'm never over tired, and I've LOST WEIGHT without even trying...I bet I got your attention with that one!
That’s what wine is for.
E@L signs off on a 1/2 dozen of the Relic, 1/2 dozen of the the Standish. 1/2 dozen Bernoullis, no he means Schubert's Theorem. Finish up with one other, something with a nice label, Borne Bollene, it was nice, yeah whatever, they're all $95. Send it to mum's place.
Life is good and The Lord has richly blessed us.
those, again, are videos. while my life has not lacked in excitement, it has been lacking in structure, which is why i am returning to this blog. my blog motivates me, keeps me going, and holds me accountable when i simply cannot. today, i ran again for the first time in almost a month. the wind on my face, my feet on the pavement, and even the stitch in my side were all reminders why i do this, why i continue helping myself become the best i can be. this blog is a reminder of how far i’ve come and i refuse to lose sight of that now. i have a half marathon in March and i fully plan on kicking its ass so hard it can’t walk straight for a week. but, in order to do that, i have to recommit to myself and to my goals, no matter how sad i may feel while letting go of vices and habits i love so much. i just need to realize that my life means more than a couple of cigarettes and beers on a monday night.
Werther
The flag next to it is the Union Jack, the banner of the United Kingdom. The red stripes that form the horizontal and vertical cross are too small and there is not enough white space on this incorrect flag.
mentally move the clocks hands forward to hasten the time.
At home we were settling down to movies when we heard the first sound - a low level soft grunting sound. Lions! We turn the sound off and listen again. Yup they are here. Jumping into the vehicle we drive towards the sound. We dont have to go far. There are two big male lions lying next to the road softly lit by the moon. Without headlights they make two large shadow shapes that an unsuspecting creature could easily walk right into.
Start by hanging your balloons from the ceiling or on a rope tied between two chairs. Make sure you do not inflate the balloon to its fullest capacity since you want the balls to be round and not oval. However, if that is what you are into, go for it!! (Tying a rope between two chairs and hanging the balloons from the rope works a lot easier since you will be making 4-6 small to medium yarn balls)
Two: Since I live a 2 minute walk from St Luke’s, Chelsea, I’d also send him a photograph of modern-day St Luke’s to remind him of happier times when on April 2, 1836 he married Catherine in this church. Though he might be alarmed by the uprooted gravestones that have made way for astroturf soccer fields.
I'd noticed it hadn't been updated for a few days, which was very unusual.
I know a lot of you make dolls and this is such a sweet cause and would truly make a wonderful woman happy.
You've got to hand it to the Frogs. They sure know how to put on a show.
and nail it in with brads.
“I Let A Song Go Out Of My Heart”
*Clarify the implications our past lives can have on our current life
For the title, I wanted a sun to go with those clouds. Well, who says you can't alter a die cut piece to work for you! :) I took the scalloped die cut piece and trimmed it to look like a sun! Layer a few clouds, add a title and a butterfly, and viola!
When we feel like the tough stuff gets worse, and it will, we just have to remember to keep pushing through. The worst is yet to come but I faithfully believe that the storm is almost over.
UNGNU Blog (ungnublog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
Choose a suitable lip colour depending on occasion. For casual outing, choose a lighter shade to get a natural look. If attending dinner function, a darker shade or bright red lip colour will stand you out. Use either a lip stick, lip gloss or you may choose to use both. A lip gloss will give a nice and healthy shine to the lip.
What is likely is that they fear tracking of their purchases and reporting to an agency by the store . This concern has same basis in fact. I witnessed one incident where a bodega owner who routinely used his entire EBT benefit to purchase sodas to stock the shelves of his business was reported to a fraud hotline. Using his "free money" benefits at the grocery store is probably far less expensive than buying the same amount of stock from authorized soda vendors or the discounts offered in a bulk items store. A few people concerned with the bodega owner purchasing soda in amounts far above what would reasonably considered to be for personal use reported him to the benefits office and shortly after that he stopped visiting the store.
I hope your Monday was as good as mine ( if not better!).
INFECTION
In terms of assimilation, print and TV will both have to work on converging their online entities with their existing entities, ending the era of web operating as a separate unit. Newsrooms will have to be restructured to account for this change, and this will necessitate training staff to use and understand the value of online and weeding out those that do not and cannot change.
Austin-based marketing agency nFusion is proud to sponsor the Marketing Executive Group’s (MEG) spring conference, “Rock the Status Quo,” in Chicago May 2 – 4. MEG, a study group of the National Restaurant Association, hosts the conference where industry leaders gather to learn from, challenge, inspire and connect with each other as they explore the newest big ideas in the industry. Over the three-day conference attendees will gather to gain insights on new trends across consumer behavior, branding, social media and more.
Neighbors who live adjacent to the building complained of flooding and cracked walls. City inspectors have issued dozens of violations for expired permits, faulty fencing and other problems.
In addition to offering us this creepy, awful realization, however, Lynne Ramsay’s film is a sustained critique of the crazy cultural contradictions we hurl at mothers all the time. Those reality shows filled with problematic children and terrible parenting — parents who cede authority to a stranger who shames them on network TV. State laws that not only permit potential employers to ask women whether they’re mothers, but which view motherhood as a “problem” for a woman doing the job (mothers are disproportionately discriminated against in hiring and promotions, and pay a “mommy penalty” in lower wages for the rest of their careers). Draconian new laws designed to criminalize “bad” mothers even when the science of such determinations is sketchy at best — these are just tips of the iceberg of schizophrenic ways that American mothers are simultaneously put on pedestals and punished. Google “mommy wars” and you’ll find infinitely more chaos.
As I got older, I started to form an idea about why I always feel so out of place. I think it is because piece of me dwells in that home in East Dennis. There was a woman who made it possible for me to find the place where my soul fully lives, if only for a week a year. She saved me many, many times and she never even knew it. She helped me understand what it was like to live completely and fully, if only for a little bit at a time. I am 'in place' there.
Government has no right to suppress “hateful, vile, despicable speech” but society should not tolerate it, Councilman Paul Krekorian said. “We can drown out that hatred with a loud chorus.”
“Tha’ was a great talk ye di’, lass,” Crusader Gregory Powel said to Brulee with a thundering slap to her back. She tried not to wince.
A chuckle escapes my lips.
Last bit, all the earlier books had a solid humor, this book lacked it. To tell you the fact, five point someone was the first book in my life, that made me laugh out loud till my stomach hurt.
Grateful to God tonight for the blessings of the day and look forward to the blessings of tomorrow.
I'll fix your feet til you cant walk
‘Fusion Junction’ aims at a niche group of readers – those who enjoy character design, game art and comic book art. Because its audience is so acute it will probably fail to be anything more than a pretty picture book for those outside of these worlds. Though it presents a solid group of artists, it would have benefit by involving a greater number (perhaps a minimum of six artists). However, I feel that the book has touched on an art subject that many other groups will be quick to copy and in this sense is ahead of the game.
The most immediate comparison for Sweet Movie would be the following year’s Salo, in its use of power and abhorrent sexuality to make a political statement. In this case we have dueling stories. In one side we see a comment on communism, represented by a boat whose bow is the face of Karl Marx, captained by a woman who lures youngsters to their death with sweets and sex. Call this the glossy allure of ideology gone wayward. In the other story, a beauty pageant winner, by virtue of her purity (gynecological exams being part of the event), is married to a milk tycoon. What follows is seemingly a critique of Western capitalism with its abusive power dynamics and virgin/whore paradoxes. Or maybe it means none of this; for being as much of a message film as this one seems to be, it’s messages aren’t that clear. Or maybe I’m trying to make it too much of a think piece and it is just meant as a shocking comedy only vaguely about all the ideologies that made the 20th Century so bloody.
Also to avoid so much trash I've also been saving cans, glass and plastic containers in the garage. I suppose someday I'll load them all up and take them to a recycling center somewhere.
That craving of our hearts… our search for belonging… our need for a place to be a home… is not a problem. It’s a reminder. It’s truth. It’s our guide. We don’t belong here.
Actually Poker is a game which has need of some skills and a lot of luck to win when you are playing. So a brief and reliable site is to be needed to start or play the online poker test.
I don’t really know what’s appropriate right now since we just started dating and his dad is sick. I don’t want to be overbearing but I want him to know I’m thinking of him (all the damn time!). I’m a little nervous that even when this stuff with his dad settles down (which might really end in him dying) that we’ll still hang out. Bean said texting every other day is good, but when he told me this morning they might shut off this ventilator, isn’t it kind of insensitive to text on Wednesday and basically ask if his dad died two days ago? I want to be present, but not too much.
The photo is of my sweet grand daughter Adalyn! she is almost 2 but she OWNS her grandpa's heart!! When he asks her for a kiss, she puckers up and and it's just the cutest thing! Ok ...enough bragging!
Is it like in the movies? The big and wordy books, or just like the perfection that’s taken up residency in my dreams? Do I need some love? Do I need to be drowned in emotions and filled with desire, a friendly face that stays has got to approach my dreams and walk with me into reality - surely.
Manifest the changes into being, think them through, meditate and flow simply, rather than push the river with goals and standards not unique to you.
Not going to lie. I considered it.
One of the problems with the state bar's reticence to discipline prosecutors is that even when complaints are dismissed, that does little to reassure the public that all is well. It's hard at this point to believe the bar would enforce rules for prosecutors in any event. Maybe it's true no violations occurred, but it's difficult for the public to have confidence in that judgment.
As for ‘petty’… well, we’ll return to that in a moment.
Are you participating? Do you have your plans and plots in place?
Nice beer to drink on a cloudy Sunday afternoon getting ready to watch the Steelers!
As a seasoned journalist, Cormac had a keen eye for an angle. Over chats by the roaring fire and cups of ‘sleepy tea,’ we explored the angles my own life offered for stories. It turned out that my poor eyesight, the thing that had prevented me from getting the job, yielded a rich seam of ideas that I could mine. My family’s links with the countryside and country sports could also prove fruitful.
I’m afraid to go to college, especially with all this money crap hanging over my head, but I want to just leave and get it done already. Everyone else is already started, settled, and loving it.
I thought I would never have to say this but Najib is even more dangerous and destructive than Mahathir in just three years for Malaysians and Malaysia.
That got me thinking. What changes can I make to my daily routine to eke out a little more novel-writing time during the day?
We know there is a approaching pathological need in some readers to track what, when, and where they read. ReadMore aims to enable such matters by helping you track how many reading sessions it takes you to finish a book, how fast you read, when you read, and other statistics. We only wish that the program could aggregate and publish your stats so that you could share them, like little baseball cards with your key numbers. For two bucks, there’s a lot of OCD potential here.
* Its been a very sad week in our district/school. This afternoon, we will say goodbye to a fellow coworker who lost her battle with cancer. One of our elementary classrooms lost a student this week and one of my students lost her father this week. Please say a prayer for all those affected by these deaths.
press in lined tin and refrigerate for a couple of hours - cut up in small pieces and store in air-tight container in the fridge - eat often!
So, the pt.2 of my last post is coming… but those are the kinds that involve a lot of thinking. Sometimes I’m just not feelin’ it! I’ve got all kinds of fun random crap bouncing around in my head, but a little voice keeps telling me “you should write pt.2 first!” Today, I decided F IT! So here comes a shit storm of randomness…
Here’s more. About 1.494 billion kilograms of rice, valued at P32.87 billion at a retail price of P22 per kilo are wasted due to poor harvest and post-harvest practices, Malaya reported. That’s why the Philippine Rice Research Institute (PhilRice) develops a guide in harvesting, threshing, cleaning, drying, storing, and milling to help farmers address problems on harvest and post-harvest losses, the report added.
the years of longing and regret indelibly drawn
(a) should the intellectual effort and skill of creating data be excluded?
M – is for Managing your Habits and Actions. Establishing good habits is essential to managing your Time Trash. When your actions are tied to your values and become habits everything becomes easier including Time Management.
Unshed tears gather in an underground pool as I wander here and there, thinking around things. There should be a place where thoughts sprout on their own once you cast them off. I'm in that dangerous time of the year when whatever I say isn't what anyone hears. I want things to end that should end. I want a wide road back to normal, with room on it for us to walk barefoot in the glow of a lantern or the last light of the evening sun.
Last night, my son proudly displayed his graduating class shirt. I was excited to share this adolescent moment with him. Proud mama of a graduating kid. But then the moment took on a whole new meaning. He said, “mom look at the designer signature on the bottom!”. When I saw the name, I immediately had tears in my eyes. The designer was my son! He then said, “Mom, there were designs way better than mine. But I did what you always tell us. I kept believing and seeing myself as the winner no matter what the other designs were.”
When you suggest a place to eat, and go on and on, and rattle off a grocery list of stuff that you've eaten, it does no good whatsoever for you to say, "The lamb was DELICOUS! So tender! We've also had the broiled chicken, and it was some of the best chicken we've ever eaten. The rib roast was also very good, very juicy..."
I look at my little brown backpack on the floor and almost feel inclined to say to it “are you ready for this one my old friend?” I always try to travel light. One pair of jeans, 1 dress pants, 2 shorts, and 5 shirts fits perfectly alongside my laptop in this Burton backpack. It was designed for snowboarders so I use the exterior snowboard holding straps to hold my sandals. Two side pockets for holding my camera, sunglasses, and other frequently needed items. My one optional item I can’t decide if I should take is the PC headset I could use for making Google Voice calls. I know it would tempt me every moment I remember having it, so what should I do?
H. Aingeisgunnakumm
Answer: The same thing as a French kiss, only down under.
In 2008, many who agreed that he lacked executive qualifications
Introverts are perfectly comfortable with their own thoughts. They think a lot. They daydream. They like to have problems to work on, puzzles to solve. But they can also get incredibly lonely if they don’t have anyone to share their discoveries with. They crave an authentic and sincere connection with ONE PERSON at a time.
Me: OK. (turning to walk on, burning with anger, and fighting the impulse to shout "If I was you, Officer, I wouldn't blame pedestrians for my inattention and law-breaking. You know, if I was you.")
Anyways...now that I just updated you all I was thinking I would do a small post everyday. I will try my best. And I won't be hard on myself, it will be something simple and hopefully more of you will enjoy it.
The type of degree can somewhat determine the type of job. Undergraduate degrees are less specialized and geared more toward the fundamental elements of aerospace design. A masters still has its hands-on component but includes more research and investigation, while a PhD gives more in-depth, specialized knowledge geared toward specific industry research.
Whose trademark is to hold the Gāṇḍiva Bow,
Men he made to stand, and women he made to fall
When we practice noticing, we learn to slow down the mind and give space for learning from our experiences, thoughts, and feelings. There is a knowing and a power that comes with stillness. The disciplines were given as gifts of refreshment meant to restore and nourish our souls. When we cease all our striving and calm our minds, we may notice we can actually listen for the voice of God and receive what he has promised, that “In Your presence there is fullness of joy.”
For me, one of the most heart-rending tracks that Herrmann composed. Ominous and funereal at the outset, the material for strings that enters soon after this sombre beginning is just so full of emotion. Shows that Herrmann was never “just” the composer who scored the Hitchcock films.
Amidst these short-lived fashions, there were a few TOTP clues on what was to come. Heavy Metal Kids were proto punk, and had no obvious connection to the Pub Rock scene that birthed Eddie & The Hot Rods. I remember seeing She's No Angel at the time and thinking it really stuck out like a sore thumb, quite scary (too scary to crack the Top 50, as it turned out). The backing group looked like a fat Strokes, and singer Gary Holton was some kind of Clockwork Orange/New York Dolls hybrid. Not altogether GOOD, but still they had something that almost everything else on the show lacked - here was a bit of bleedin’ energy at last. And how much did Thin Lizzy's performances jumped out of the screen? Everyone was actually dancing, not just doing that sad TOTP shuffle, to The Boys Are Back in Town (no.8). Likewise, Status Quo's propulsive Mystery Song (no.11) was a hard diamond in the midst of smug piano-led ballads by John Christie and Randy Edelman.
Assistant Chief Constable Steve Heywood acknowledged that officers could have dealt with the case "better than we did". But he denied that the girl's complaints had been "brushed under the carpet" because officers were reluctant to confront the issue of race. "At the time we did what we thought was best," he said. "We have learned a lot of lessons. "The issue here is genuinely about vulnerability. It just happens that they are Asian men. In no way did we sweep it under the carpet."
4. Everyone looks about forty pounds heavier with all the puffer coats, big boots, hats, and gloves. No, it’s not a good thing but it’s warm and sensible and what choice do we have? At least boots are fashionable these days….
Probably the favorite thing for the 3 years old is going to the top of the hill beside their field. They kick their soccer balls down to the coaches. Then, the coaches kick it back up to them. They kept wanting to do that over and over.
When I was in high school, I made this dress as a birthday gift for my mom. That would have been at least 13 years ago. Then a couple of years ago, she offered it back to me as a hand-me-down. I gladly accepted!
The only thing that is good about the Panama season is the Haunted Acting by William Fichtner as Mahone. First class stuff.
We rang at three in the afternoon as I could no longer stand it and the nurse stated that my results were not in. I could here her rummaging in the office and then she came back on the phone and told me they found my bloods... still sitting on the bench. I burst into tears and she explained that a pregnancy test would now give an accurate response. Spunkhead raced down the chemist and I peed on the stick...freaking out and as it sat there on the bathroom bench soooooo desperate to see those two illusive lines
A farthing cheese to choke him.
Sarah is a First Place and Readers' Choice Award winner of Clarity contests. She is the debut author of Plum Blossoms in Paris. As Publishers Weekly astutely recognizes (as if there were any question), Sarah's style weaves "a fantastical quality to the dreamer's idyll of a romantic tryst with an artistic Frenchman in Paris." If you haven't read it, do it. I gave you the link and everything.
[insert your blog's name] has been added to The Atheist Blogroll. You can see the Atheist Blogroll badge in my sidebar. The Atheist blogroll is a community building service provided free of charge to Atheist bloggers from around the world. If you would like to join, visit Mojoey at Deep Thoughts for more information.Your blog can contain nudity, but I draw the line at pornography. Blogs that portray pornography will be dropped. I am the sole judge when it comes to determining what is porn, although I do listen to the voice of the community. To Join:
Inmate A: “I don’t believe you.”
“Ready?” Matt asked as he revved the engine.
I don't know about you, but my feet were stomping the entire two hours we were there.
Disclaimer, currently their is no flawless answer to this question. All ideas suggested could help combat piracy but their is no way to stop it entirely!
Sunday afternoon comes, and we pack up. We are exhausted, but feel alive. My body tells me it’s been through hell.
What I wouldn't give for an old fashioned honest to goodness pantry. And while I'm daydreaming I'll take a root cellar attached to it, so I can have cool damp vegetable storage as well as cool dry canned good storage.
“So this is your man, then?” Brandon laughed. He looked at Nathan and they both nodded at eachother, acting as if they could read minds. What the fuck?
If you have access to iPads/iPods for student learning, the resources below are very valuable:
--I like that I am not a "typical" girl...not saying that there really is a 'typical' girl, but I'm kinda weird in that way. I love sports! love them! I love to watch them, I love to play them, I love to talk about them, I love to coach/ref them, I love sports! and it's fun because sometimes it surprises people, and that's always fun!
After Monday evening`s spinning class, the instructor asked us to slow down and close our eyes. He said: “think about your workout today, think about this day. Have you reached your goals? If you did not, what happened? What can you change next time? How can you improve, what did you like or hate? ..”.
Good luck with the blog hop!! :) This is one kit I seriously can't wait to get ahold of and play with... I have so many pictures of the kids that I can't wait to use with this kit!! :)
Get nitty gritty with all the details and invest in outside help on the parts that you would like a second opinion you will in the end invest in sales education and further enhance your appeal as a company both as employer and seller of products/services.
As I finished the last of this post, the Fray’s “You Found Me” came on, and I smiled a little. Some days I wonder if God doesn’t work his own DJ booth up there. Pretty talented guy.
Statistics compiled by Environment Canada show that greenhouse gas pollution from oilsands companies, which require an energy-intensive production process, have jumped 300 per cent since 1990, exceeding those of all cars on Canadian roads, not including light-duty trucks, and cancelling out reductions in emissions from other sectors. The latest federal data also shows that the oilsands producers are no longer reducing the pollution per barrel of oil produced, contradicting claims made in a separate industry-sponsored marketing campaign.
"John West, the best a man can get".
Lost youth is sad. My lost youth – everyone’s lost youth – is sad. It is sad that Jamie, Stacy, Bob and others are dead. It is sad that I have fallen out with some of the people in the photos who were my best friends at the time. It is sad that I am in London and they are not.
Geels, Antoon. “A Note on the Psychology of Dhikr: The Halveti-Jerrahi Order of Dervishes in Istanbul,” International Journal for the Psychology of Religion 6:4 (1994), pp. 229-251.
Cost of this meal is depending on the sizing and what do you really want to have. Normal size is THB 35, special size is THB 70. Soft-boiled eggs in Chinese herb is THB 7 for 1. All the soup is THB 25 per bow.
Caleb and I have also decided to purchase our meats in bulk once a month and visit a local farmer's market for our weekly fruits and veggies. I'm currently looking into partnering with a chicken farm (helloooo fresh eggs and chicken!) and hopefully get into some kind of co-opish deal. Pray that I receive wisdom and revelation on how to go about doing this, please!
over the summer season,
A way to help with this is to surround yourself with people, places, and things that will remind you of God and your need for him so that you will be propelled back to the Word and prayer. The apps you use, the music you listen to, the people you engage with on Facebook and Twitter, and where you choose to eat your lunch (i.e. – to get a good view of God’s creation) can all be used to help you cultivate a heart of love and devotion to God that will equip you for the fight against temptation when it occurs. Fighting temptation begins well before the battle ever begins, so pray for God to give you the motivation and discipline to prepare for attack. When this happens your reactions to temptation will only be quicker, more decisive, and more intentional.
One Hot Pleasure (DJ Mr. White Remix) Electronica 128 bpm 5:41
One I thought I'd stay away from is the resurgence of neon but I find myself really wanting a pair of neon heels.
But I'm short on sleep, and I'm tired, and most nights I go to bed feeling like an utter failure because there is always so much that didn't get done that day. The work is never done, and my personal commitments are suffering. I have nothing left for my family except snarky comments about the housework that didn't get done while I was working. The only one who gets any quality time is Rigby, and that's because she attacks me or cuddles with me until I pay attention to her. (That's the solution, Frank and MJ and Chloe and Emma: pounce on my feet or get in my face if you want some time from me.)
This education continued on with whatever items of Rob’s I was trying to get rid of. I had no want to know any of it, but once again had to because I had to deal with it and get it done. The biggest item was our boat. Rob had always handled everything mechanical that needed repairs, whether it be the boat, cars, house repairs so this was all pretty new to me and I didn’t like being in that position to trust what others were telling me when they were involved in the repairs and had monetary gain as their agenda.
Some people have more money than taste. Especially when it comes to kncoking down a fine house and replacing it with one which would be worth half as much. Here is the PINS reference if you want to object.
We live in the best country in the world....
if you have seen this image, or anything similar to this image, anywhere on Dartmoor, or further afield, wherever this may be, please get in touch.
Forever yours,
We eventually got around to it at 9 PM.
Nothing in a Japanese Garden is left to nature or chance. Every piece is carefully selected and placed in a specific way to create a series of vignettes or moments of interest throughout the garden.
Make the icing by blending 3 tablespoons of powdered sugar, a drop of vanilla and a teaspoon of water together. Add more water or sugar as needed to make a thin icing. Take the cake out of the oven and while it is still warm drizzle the icing over the top. Use a spoon or fork to drip icing in thin strings about a half inch apart over the top of the cake. I go back and forth in one direction, then back and forth in the other direction. Then I begin at the outer edge and spiral into the center. It is a surprisingly pretty cake.
i sat there with my arms around her, hugging her,
Jessie wants to play hockey, eventually making it to the NHL. It's not a problem per se, but it will be a battle because Jessie is growing up in the 1960s and there was only one Black professional hockey player at this time, Willie O'Ree for him to look up to. Jessie is offered the opportunity to attend a prestigious New Hampshire boarding school on a full scholarship and the chance to play on the school's hockey team. Best case scenario Jessie hopes he will get spotted by scouts and be on his way to the NHL after a grand college career, worst case scenario, Jessie plays for one of the best high school hockey teams in the country and attends a top college. He sees this situation as a win-win and although his parents have some serious misgivings, they ultimately agree. Unfortunately, Jessie expected some racism but he is shocked by the racism he faces from 99% of his teammates, he expected his teammates to come around when he showed his skills. Jessie does not want to throw in the towel, but he's not sure he wants to spend four years of his life being miserable, and not given playing time by his hockey coach.
Not that fan emotions were not played. The first sequence of the film is young officers being guided by Spock through the Kubayashi maru--the no win situation. The bridge crew is killed by attacking Klingons, including Spock, before it is revealed to be a training scenario. Kirk enters the simulation to both lament that the young officers had not handled certain death well because of their inexperienced youth and that traveling through space is a job forth young.
ADD in egg and blend til just combined
Did a long walk today delivering free tickets to events. Leyton High Road is always a nightmare traffic-wise and now the road is being made pretty for July.
Chocolate mousse preparation:
Late one night, we needed eggs at home. I ran down to Ricky’s. My friend was at the cash register. He smiled and said, “Not 1:00.”
One of the ways that Disney keeps the site safe for children is to pre-select the phrases they are allowed to use in conversation. That prevents children using inappropriate language or revealing personal information. As a result, the service has a database of phrases which can be matched to their equivalents in other languages.
Please stick mainly to the above colours with skin tones and hair colour not included in the colour combo.
19. To remove grease stains, either add baking soda to the wash load or pretreat the stains with a baking soda paste.
This is all further proof of how bored Americans have become with outer space. After centuries of fantasizing about advanced civilizations with sexy multi-boobed aliens and living on Mars, we boldly went where no man has gone before and turned up … rocks and gases. As a result, this summer NASA put the Space Shuttle out of its misery and Hollywood hasn't considered putting a new "Star Trek" series on the tube in years.
That is a line from the Woody Allen film, Annie Hall.
So how about charging the ragheads the same price for a bushel of wheat as they do for a barrel of crude? Rice? hey, a gallon-container of rice for the same price as a gallon of diesel.
This week we began a new unit in reading, and the theme is transportation. For their theme launch project, my kiddos had to create their favorite mode of transportation, and share it with the class. Here are a few, they were so excited to show it off!
still in good condition
I just love the camera! The controls are very intuitive, it has a large aperture, and so far at least it seems to take great pictures. I took these as the sun was setting behind the Tyson building but was still lighting the trees and the top storey of our apartments. Tough lighting conditions, but I thought they came out decent:
1999 – American Beauty
When we say that yes, indeed, our seven, eight, nine, now ten-year-old (how the heck did that happen?) is along for the ride the question inevitably goes back to one of the ones above. And the oft spoken assumption is pretty soon she’ll be a terrible teen who will rebel against our lifestyle and will want to go shopping in the
Even the progressive call for Medicare for All (cite) is a rhetorical strategy aimed at presenting single-payer health care in the publicly-acceptable language of social insurance as opposed to in the context of conservative ghost stories about the evils of the NHS.
Thankfully, the Coyotes would not have to face Concordia until the National Championship game on Dec. 3, but I have a feeling the results would be different this time around anyways.
ANCHORAGE AK
Coriander (cilantro for the Americans) leaves – 2 tbsp
(And yes, she tweeted about the mess, and in a way that was dismissive…. Only to backtrack and be like, “Tee hee! 140 characters and all.”)
No, no, you can’t sit down,
Add baking powder, baking soda and salt to the already sifted flour. Then sift dry ingredients again.
Raytown EMS will be hosting the Community Blood Center’s Blood Drive at the EMS Station on May 23rd from 3:00 to 6:00pm. You may sign up either online at savealifenow.org and use raytownems as the password or contact Kim (737-6030) to schedule an appointment or for any questions. Walk-ins are also welcomed. All persons who attend the blood drive and attempt to donate blood will receive a voucher for "buy one get one free" ticket to Schlitterbahn Water Park.
I want you to focus on the bad things that happen repeatedly in your life. Those things that seem to constantly happen over and over again and it’s annoying.
This one baffles me. Why are so many people searching for jelly? And not jelly recipes, just jelly. I’ve already voiced my disdain for jelly as a dessert option but as it’s bringing so many visitors to my blog, I may have discovered a new-found respect for the gelatine based wobbly food.
34 - If your car could travel at the speed of light, would your headlights work?
And at the end, just when he has finally won out, and I'm ready to go to bed with a cup of herbal tea . . .
I have been watching from the sidelines as someone I know has gone through a painful ‘rebirth’. She contracted cerebral malaria, a killer for so many in Africa. By the time they realised what it was, she was in serious trouble, her body functions shutting down in shock. Two weeks in intensive care, out to a normal ward, and back again when the infections in her feet developed at an alarming rate. Then the quick decision, amputate or she will die.
Oh, I saw his invitation. He said, “Come on, we’ll go ridin for awhile.”
Style: American Adjunct Lager
and he was a jackass the entire 5 days..
I didn’t see that one coming. “Work boots? But why? You don’t wear work boots. The last time you wore them was when you worked construction years ago.”
I would like to file a complaint against…
I continue to mourn the loss of Miss Kitty, therefore this blog will have a revised twist in order to rest my creativity for the time being. I am asking my followers to begin an open forum on this blog, to have a voice, to interact, to comment below, and perhaps we will learn and inspire each other.
I have become obsessed with the Making of a rainbow cake.
Next weekend, I will be spending time with two of my favorite girls. We are going to Boston for two night and then Cape Cod for two nights. I can't wait. We always have a blast together.
Our MP, Tim Loughton has set up a new poll on his website in which he wants to know your views of the Brighton and Hove Albion proposal and whether you are in favour of developing the Strategic Gap.
422940 Tobacco & tobacco products
To call for this is not particularly novel in progressive circles; the more interesting question is where to draw that line. Many, such as former Labor Secretary Robert Reich have called for the minimum wage to be permanently indexed at 1/2 the median wage, out of an egalitarian principle which has a lot of merit. However, given a median wage of $15.95 an hour, this would result in an $8/hour minimum wage, not that different from its current level and just barely enough to keep a family of two out of poverty, let alone a family of three or four.
Pinking Shears/Border Punch: Fiskars (upper crest)
3. Bring to a boil over medium-high heat and cook 1 to 2 minutes, until as thick as desired. Sere as a sauce or use as a marinade for chicken.
Yesterday we did home church as a family. As I was listening to David Platt he said these simple words that shook me to the core “It’s better to lose our life than to waste it.”
Normally, I’d queue my tattered list of excuses, but not today. Excuses are a stumbling block to the facts; that is, I’m learning to acknowledge my own distractibility. It’s a serious affliction — for me — that goes beyond what I’ve always understood as writer’s block.
At this point in time, Lance Henriksen was making an impact with some unique, standout performances. Bishop is a career highlight, indeed. “Artificial person” so fits the description of him. He has human qualities, but they are slightly off. Again, subtlety enters the approach with an air of eerie creepiness to the droid Bishop. Not in a malevolent way like Ian Holm’s Ash from the previous film, but as something just uneasy, unsettling about him. At first, he doesn’t appear to be anything but human. However, the more time an audience spends with him, the more these peculiar aspects nag your attention. Because of Ripley’s own unease around a droid, an audience can also gain an uncertainty about him, but it’s great how the relationship between Ellen and Bishop builds towards a place of trust.
On the Jolly Roger website it states that the toddlers' area is exclusively for children under four years old or 95cm in height. Oliver will not be three for another two months, but already exceeds the specified height by 5cm.
9. Final Fantasy - Lewis Takes Action (2:54)
Heather Vogel Frederick
18. I live in the house of my dreams; in tranquil surroundings filled with love, a blessed family and happy kids!!
CZECH BEER FESTIVAL
Yes, you’d both be quite au fait with hotel life. What would be the worst you’ve stayed in?
Chaos Theory.
Because, yes, besides the fact that they were trying to copy-paste every beautiful thing that was created by the Roman and Greek cultures before them, some even thought that bringing something new and fresh would help humanity a lot (a concept that today's Hollywood can't quite fully grasp).
May, TBA Central Michigan, Taught by Debbie Olson
Mostly, they are just really really funny, and even though they are still have a lot to learn I am amazed at what they already know. I have readers, and writers, incredible artists and creative thinkers.
Soak Things Up
Implicit in our conduct is we have no fight in us, are easy. The crimes committed by ethnics are not the same as those committed by our people, they are how people invade by demography - raping, stealing and assaulting us – they are here to take. Their body language shows it as they swagger through our streets.
I then went to find another container to put the cornbread in, but I woke up.
So parenthood still teaches us new things every day, and seeing the world through our son's eyes is still an adventure, even as he becomes more and more independent. Amazing.
Call it imagination and child's play. I prefer to call it communing and soul stirring. Miss J. - my granddaughter, who did not have the privilege of meeting my sweet Momma in this earth, told us a while ago that she actually did talk to her in heaven. She wouldn't tell us any more than that. Only that she knew her.
I might regret cosleeping so much later on. Callie might not like to sleep by herself. We might have night struggles trying to get her in bed. But when I look at that sleeping face.... I'll deal with it.
Different compelling arguments have been advanced for a better understanding and appreciation of the value of IP and its potential impact on business value. Intangible assets (patents, marks, know-how, licenses..) play increasingly a key factor for firms’ economic performance. They are particularly important for early stage-technology based companies as IP is viewed as the primary contribution to earning power and future value.
Last Tuesdays of the Month - Tuesday, September 30.
I’m happy because…
I'd also like to see this film for personal reasons. My grandfather was an engineer for the Northern Pacific, and my father was a brakeman, conductor, trainmaster and assistant superintendent. Me, I took a lot of trips from one end of the line to the other, usually riding in sleeper cars just like the one described in the book. I even worked for the NP (and later the BN) myself, doing vacation relief stints in a variety of menial positions. Guess I still have a little railroading in my blood.
Link to from other applicable sections such as employment non-discrimination/ equal employment opportunity policy, dress code, restroom, locker room (if related resources are already provided)
Label : Culpri
It is a happy ending then to have Kafka sit on the shore and contemplate the world's ever-changing nature and yet not be bothered by it. Miss Saeki was unable to relinquish her desire for a single thing, and thus was "drowning" in grief before finding relief in death. Their two divergent narratives give perhaps the simplest gloss of the novel, and it's all here in these crucial eighteen lines.
